Thanks Tom Baker for tagging me. To tell you the truth, I enjoy answering questions. It makes me reflect on things I wouldn’t have thought about and it helps me discover new things about myself. I’m a bit shy to approach some of the bloggers I follow. I might break the rules and tag less than 11 people. Some of the blogs I follow aren’t personal blogs too. I’m pretty sure they won’t answer the questions. Anyway, I am doing this just for fun! I’m also curious about what the bloggers I follow think.
White wine with fish and red wine with meat – that still holds up I think. For most people’s taste it is unwise to go against this as the proteins in fish make red wine taste metallic and unpleasant. If you like it, fine, but most people seem not to.
672 FC wickets at 20.90 with 33 five-wicket hauls
8.Violłncia
Renault have found a new solution to the blown diffuser concept. In fact they’ve turned it on its head. With an exhaust that exits at the front of the sidepods.
Right now, I wouldn’t want to be any other age.
Another project that I worked on yesterday and finished up this morning is a set of hot pads. They are nice and big - eight inches square. I stitch from corner to corner to hold the layers together and then bind them like a quilt. For the hanging loop, I made crocheted braid that is typically used in Romanian Point Lace. I made a 3" piece for each hot pad and then used the same crochet thread to attach them to the pads.
You feel kind of crappy when you don’t write.
Yep, Semana Santa is in full swing here. Well, that makes it sound like something's really happening, but what's happening is a lot of nothing, on purpose. WHAT?! You see, today is Good Friday, and that means the whole country has shut down in order to contemplate the crucifixion. This day is treated with much respect.
JoAnn Falletta
There once was a hill which when you jumped off and say something, you'll land in it.
Wishing that I might be a space to fill
The men that had once tried and failed
So when offered the chance to encounter a new-to-me poet-novelist with a decidedly dark yet lyrical take on Bombay's opium-to-heroine culture of the 1970's through '90's, I thought, "Sure. Don't mind if I do."
As dinner finished I told him that I still have a lot of doubts about that time period. I said that I feel like he lied to me a lot and I still don’t know what the truth is. He said again that they never met in person. He also admitted a few other small lies about doing drugs when he told me he hadn’t. He said he would tell me anything I wanted to know. I said that I do need more details – that I need to know everything.
For a moment you feel acting down, you can arrange a game of "guess the number of words in the name of Justin Bieber." Online word generator can help you print the complete list of about 500.
I bet you guys thought I forgot about this, huh?
Take it to the Lord in prayer.
- last Friday's Christmas shopping with my Mum
Phil Tufnell: How many Olympic Games have been held?
For her birthday I dipped 5 plastic spoons in different chocolates for a treat. I wrapped each one in plastic treat bags. Instead of tying them each with a ribbon she won’t see, I tied each one with a fuzzy pipe cleaner taking care to tuck the sharp ends away. Giving her something familiar with something she can taste and feel is comforting and exciting.
But in the meantime I wish everyone a great weekend.
8. For burnt-on food in the bottom of pots, sprinkle with baking soda, then add hot water. Let soak overnight; the dried on food will come loose much more easily.
This copy had seen better days and put ClickRepair through its paces. Although there's still some noise on the occasional intros and outros of some tracks, it's not so bad you can't enjoy the music - and unless you own a copy you ain't gonna hear most of it anywhere else!
*DSP - Pink Paislee & Papermania
is important to me to at least TRY for an evolved peaceful and just world.
All along, since I arrived, there was always this guilt I felt while being with him. Part of me was constantly telling myself I didn't come to Europe for a romance, I came here to find a job and make a life. Then it occurred to me that maybe I got the order wrong, and that I was a fucking fool, because there are plenty of jobs out there but there's only one of him, and there's only this one moment right now that I have, for me.
Now I know she ain’t you but she’s here and she’s got that dark rhythm in her soul
Chandler-who did not even go to the lake-set about looking up info as soon as she heard we saw snakes. "Copperheads eat frogs, chicks and lizards."
Then the chairman of the Constitutional Court requested the newly-elected head of the state to take the oath of office. With the right hand on the Russian Constitution Vladimir Putin swore allegiance to the Russian people.
Back at Double X, Michelle tells Mi Roo that Director Goo renewed his contract with them. Did she meet with him? At first she responds that she didn’t but not wanting to out Tan Ya either, she replies that she did. Mi Roo doesn’t have an answer for why she did but Michelle feels indebted to her and wonders how she’ll pay Mi Roo back. Mi Roo refuses the offer because she made the choice to do it. Although she didn’t say it before, Michelle compliments Mi Roo on the column. Not the Sofia column but Mi Roo’s column. She liked it so much that it almost brought tears to her eyes for reminding her about her first love. Then it dawns on Mi Roo that Michelle had penned the Taurus article and Michelle presents the Chanel bag as proof. Since they’ve both been in the same boat, Mi Roo can forgive Michelle just a little bit. Michelle promises that she won’t force Mi Roo into doing something that she doesn’t want to do with the column and leave the men she’s dating up to her. But she hopes that Mi Roo will continue to write it. Mi Roo discloses that nothing really happened with Director Goo, at least not in the way she had thought. If she’s curious about it she’ll have to read the Leo article since she’s going to keep writing the column.
The American Angus Association is the nation’s largest beef organization, serving 30,000 members across the United States and Canada. It provides programs and services to farmers, ranchers and others who rely on the power of Angus to produce quality genetics for the beef industry and quality beef for consumers.
Listen to your heart. Jesus came to lift people’s minds because we were stuck in the doctrines of years gone by. People were stuck. Some of our religions today are still stuck. Jesus came to liberate our thoughts, to free us to think of higher conscious things, to increase the Divine vibrational cord that runs through us.
-Using a paring knife, slice the ends off of each blood orange. Then slice the rind and outer pith off the sides of the orange. Finally, slice out each segment of the orange between the membranes. Do this over a bowl and save the juice; you can also squeeze the remaining juice out of the membrane once you've removed your segments. Separate the juice and the segments.
08-21 Amsterdam, Netherlands - Olympic Stadium
More proof that drinking light beer is bad for society .
Firstly, the ferrari f355 challenge arcade game new California, not least because it's not had a mind of its performance in an echo of measures taken by the beleaguered Detroit Big Three, Ferrari's Maranello plant will be relieved to hear that the CO2 emissions the ferrari f355 challenge arcade are the ferrari f355 challenge arcade game. Based on the ferrari f355 challenge dreamcast at the ferrari f355 challenge arcade game in Quebec. Course participants are given the ferrari f355 challenge arcade game a result of the ferrari f355 challenge dreamcast next month's Paris Show will be called the ferrari f355 challenge arcade with multi-link rear set up and noticed the powerplants 'were definitely not Ferrari engines.' The Top Gear Live show were fakes. Show goers at the moment.
PS. We were also able to sing at the Cheltenham Race course, FCH chapel, and a lovely church in Stanton (a cotswolds village). I don't have pictures from these places, but just getting to be there was amazing!
A while back, I turned a closet underneath my stairs into a toy closet. I have a playroom upstairs but for some reason the toys always end up downstairs, so I decided it was time to have a "home" for some toys on the main level of our house. My plan is to blog on the upstairs playroom another time.
32And the bones of Joseph, which the children of Israel had taken up from Egypt, they put in the earth in Shechem, in the property which Jacob had got from the sons of Hamor, the father of Shechem, for a hundred shekels: and they became the heritage of the children of Joseph.
Some herbal remedies have been studied in Europe, but no information was available about the safety of squawvine as of June 2000. Squawvine is believed to be safe when taken in recommended dosages for a short time.
Add plain yogurt.
MATTHEW: This will sound like a cop-out, but all of them. The book, as with the first volume, is that good, and is filled with amazingly strange moments that make for fun reading. There are some stories that are less to my liking than others, a taste preference more than a quality issue. But that’s the beauty of an anthology–there’s usually something for everyone. And the best part with HOW THE WEST WAS WEIRD, VOL. 2, is I’ve found writers I’d not read before. It’s an honor to be included in this top-shelf collection with such a talented group of folks.
So, what am I after with this Blogfest? Drama. The word is Greek meaning "action", which is derived from "to do". Though its more common usage speaks to a specific mode of fiction represented in performances, it has also come to refer to a specific genre of fiction (neither comedy nor tragedy) involving a serious mood and conflict. That’s all just literary speak meaning drama simply covers a wide spectrum of contention, action crisis and atmosphere designed to amp up the stakes in our stories. It is an element of writing that transcends genre, so everybody can contribute. I’m looking for a sample of your work that demonstrates those qualities.
Well… I’m going to wrap this up. Tomorrow is Hubby’s birthday, and we’re going to bike shopping for him as a present. He’s been riding a mountain bike on all of our rides! So, we’re going to find him a decent road bike.
Zombie Type: Sentient – Undead – Normal Movement Speed – Not Flesh Eating
“Was he a zombie?” asked Tom.
1. Efes Girls (Anadolu Efes)
B is building a house - B's blog follows her journey in building a new home and often invites followers to give their thoughts on her choices along the way. After offering my (amateur) advice on B's handle selections, vanity heights, room layouts and more, I feel so involved with the process that I'm well and truly hooked.
VOKDA OPEN BAR 11PM TO MIDNITE AND FREE SHOTS 2AM
Bril = Brilliant = Something that is good but probably not worth the use of the world brilliant for example: This bar of chocolate is brilliant or I had a brilliant time sitting and watching T.V.
a better age.
At the time I was completing the play in end July 2004 – begun in Pristina and concluded in Monrovia – there was a global conference on AIDS being held at Bangkok and one of the issues raised there by some groups was the mistaken emphasis the United States Government was placing on abstinence instead of condom use as a weapon to combat the spread of AIDS. It was being pointed out how abstinence was no solution for married women, especially for women in Africa, who might contract the disease from their husbands.
Do we really believe that if we do not speak the truth it will go away? Be assured it will not.
And as you do the fog lifts.
It was at this point that Ms Risser intervened.
I got through work Thursday by finger-pecking with my left hand or dictating to Brigitte.
Although this act is seemingly childish and just whimsical, actually it sounds suggestive and I feel something unfulfilled in the mind. Yet the positive result of this act gives readers a bright hint.
Fisher and Frey are the authors (or popularizers) of the Gradual Release of Responsibility framework, which is very constructive.The TA response to this video was surprising to me. They like a lot of the lesson design and teacher practice here, especially the thought behind the poster project, but found the teacher off-putting and disengaging. Possibly because she's mellow? (Definitely be interested in your thoughts in the comments.)
Net added YTD: 83.5 yards.
robot crowds in – lines
It was Friday morning, so close to May I was anxious to flip the calendar and be done with the cold weather. Marlene paced the floor of her kitchen like cat that can’t find its litter box. Since she was wringing her hands, I thought she was about to confess.
Before I make this the longest blogpost I have ever created, I will leave now and wish everybody reading this a most wonderful weekend, in advance!
Obviously being in the directors suite made everything nicer and shinier, the comfy seats were not used to their full capabilities as I was so excited I could only sit bolt upright.
#1. I tell you something about me & expat life...
One might think that with all that activity going on I wouldn't have ever needed to join FT. Again with the, "go look at my BEFORE pics" and tell me how well all that activity worked out for me. IT DIDN'T! While I will admit that I felt better and was a lot stronger, I lost no weight. I lost no inches. All I DID lose was the will to even THINK about going back to the gym.
encontraba mas verdad.
We don’t need more church…we need more God!
Our driver was pretty cool and told us some crazy stories while we rode around downtown Memphis for half an hour. Neither Jon nor I had ever ridden in a horse-drawn carriage, so it was pretty fun. When we got back we went down to Tom Lee Park for the festival. We had missed a few of the bands we wanted to see (Son Volt and Kenny Wayne Shepherd) but that always seems to happen on Saturday. We went to see The Cult but didn't even attempt to get up close. We sat in the grass far away from the stage and rested. The show was okay but neither of us were too impressed. We walked down to see Al Green next, and caught a bit of Yo Gotti on the way past. We also did a little browsing at some of the shops and got a foot-long corndog (not too impressive).
~ST
if we were callow, we could grow.
Life twitches my heart. "Live," she says; "I am here."
I have been painting snowy paintings for winter, which I shall show you soon. Meantime, I am selling pictures at the Chagford ChristMART tomorrow, Saturday 5th December in the Jubilee Hall from 9am - 1pm. I shall be in excellent artistic company, and there'll be mulled wine too.
Published November 8, 1885
08.Mustard....Black....1Green/1Blue..Heavily Freckled
For A Minor Reflection are going on tour with Sigur Rós in November. Support act for 13 concerts across Europe (4 concerts @ England, Scotland, Portugal, Spain, France, Belgium, The Netherlands, Luxembourg). Finally 2 shows @ London: Alexandra Palace 20. en 21. November. Running in the family: The brother of Georg Holm, bass player of Sigur Rós, is a member of For A Minor Reflection.
A couple of websites do explain writer’s block with a whole bunch of technical terms and blah blah. One stood out in particular, and though I can’t vouch for complete accuracy, it does give you a clearer (and humorous) idea of what writer’s block really is. You can check it out sometime at “Of Cabbages & Kings – The Completely Unfactual Facts About Writer’s Block”.
I've spent most of the afternoon sitting on my beanbag crocheting. I've now got stiff shoulders and my bum has gone to sleep. Ah well. It may not be the healthiest pastime but it sure is one of the most blissfully colourful.
And I don’t know what to do with a love like that
The mother of 14 kids is asking for $2 million for her octuplets story.
I think we found the perfect medium!
2: rhetor - orator, speechmaker
I offered you my hand
It has been said (repeatedly) that I need to wear more color. While I maintain that navy, black, white, and shades of gray are *colors, I admit that I do need to branch out a bit. So BAM, floral! Well, it’s more like bam because it’s only a little floral, but color, print, pop: it’s all there. Baby steps.
Overall, I like the limited outlay an author has to pay for the basic service provided by UKUnpublished. Without seeming downbeat—this is cheap and cheerful publishing for authors unfamiliar with the publishing world, and importantly, don’t have outlandish expectations of what publishing a memoire, local history book or novel they have modestly always wanted to see in print. A lot of publishing services try to ‘big-up’ self-publishing to a point where it is sold to authors as a dream. This is a down-to-earth publishing service offering modest but fair royalties considering books are offered to the trade at up to the prescribed 55% discount:
In honor of their convention, here are some fun facts about agriculture in Alaska:
Z is for zest WE still have-- in OUR minds?
Sunday, 12 pm – 7 pm
Que lots of loud laughs, endless *can't put the book down* page turning, and the book was finished! (In one day) That's my boy ;-)
—Science fiction readers are problem solvers! Stories with downbeat endings, in which the characters have no hope of solving their problems, are strongly disliked by Analog readers. In a good SF story, the characters strive to solve their problems—and even if they fail in the end, they go down fighting, not whimpering.
1/3 cup of maple syrup
And there’s something bonzai-like about these miniature trees of a minature forest. Maybe I could draw actual bonzai trees like this and be doing “life drawing.” Whatever it is, it is free, and I like it. I have a little notebook. Maybe in time I will fill it up with a universe of small things.
The Publishing Paradigm has changed. Drastically. And It will continue to evolve now. It will continue to grow. And simply put, if the Big 6 and the agents refuse to read the writing on the wall, they too will find themselves fighting for every client.
I know I have been absent for a while.....so sorry, and I am trying to catch up with posts from all of you! I was away, visiting a wonderful, sweet friend at the beach in SC! Yes.....warm weather, gorgeous ocean views, and the best company I could have asked for! :0)
Buttons (2 or 4-holed) smaller than button kit buttons
Or take the Rays’ Matt Moore, the current darling of the press set, with his phenomenally easy cheese and fluid mechanics. With their deep farm system, scrappy playing style and ace pitching staff, the Rays are once again the trendy pick to return to the top of the American League East, and Moore is being touted as one of the key pieces of the starting rotation. Hey, I wish the guy all the best, and I’ll take more young and talented pitchers any day. But here’s that reality check again: Moore has thrown a total of 9 1/3 major league innings. Yes, they were dominant innings, including his masterful seven inning taming of the eventual AL Champion Rangers in Game 1 of the Divisional Series. But they were 9 1/3 innings. Has everyone forgotten that whole thing about teams adjusting to pitchers their second time around the league? Hell, Moore hasn’t even it made it halfway
So, I'm going to share the love! These are some blogs I've been loving and they aren't huge, but provide me with much inspiration:
the subtle species of your feelings
A dodgy set-up, is it not, as Political Scrapbook points out? All of which becomes even more dodgy when Res Publica is not, as is usually the case with such valuable social institutions, a non-profit organisation, but actually a private company:
A nation is therefore a large-scale solidarity, constituted by the feeling of the sacrifices that one has made in the past and of those that one is prepared to make in the future. It presupposes a past; it is summarized, however, in the present by a tangible fact, namely, consent, the clearly expressed desire to continue a common life. A nation's existence is, if you will pardon the metaphor, a daily plebiscite, just as an individual's existence is a perpetual affirmation of life. That, I know full well, is less metaphysical than divine right and less brutal than so called historical right.That accepted continuum argument would seem to hold water well; the social capital, the bonds that hold Scotland as a nation, only exists with the consent of the people. The folk memories and the common aspiration of the people of Scotland are what makes Scotland, the zeitgeist of modern Scotland holds Scotland of the past and Scotland of the future in its hands. The commonality of those who belong to Scotland now is what Scotland is and their joint aspiration will be what determines her future. Where you came from doesn’t matter half as much as where you want to go.
ain’t got nothing on my vanishing elephants. If you want to see those
Again, may 2012 bring only good things to you and your household,.
This did not make her happy.
This is the Inspiration from the Shabby Tea Room
From that mudville.
Christopher Walken emerged an acting star for his role as Nick. Nick becomes disconnected with reality and stays in Saigon and begins playing roulette for money and the thrill, not realizing his actions and what he has left behind at home. It’s only when Michael (De Niro) returns to Saigon to attempt to bring his friend home does he briefly see his friend through his jaded and fogged view of life.
God in church
Dust to dust …
Prepare to save yourselves hours of toil and sweat this Hanukkah by simply baking your potato latkes in the oven. In response to my post earlier this week with a recipe for Oven Baked Cauliflower, Zucchini and Leek Latkes, I received some requests for a traditional potato latke version. So quite simply, here’s how you do it. It’s pretty much the same recipe as the pan fried latkes but now, it’s just oven baked. Using this oven baking method, you can really have fun and add whatever else you want to the latkes. I’m keeping my version simple for the sake of the children!
For Brooklynites, Newark's decision raises questions about the arena planned for the Atlantic Yards development, which similarly would have a considerable expanse of glass, a design feature vulnerable to a truck bomb, McCarthy's concern.
Well, after doing some research on “Vickie”, it seems that it was a pretty popular name between 1950 and 1960. Vickie is a variant of “Victoria,” which means, “victory.” Wow. That’s a surprise. In the 1950′s Vickie was #61 in popularity, with 71,966 Vickie’s named during that decade. In 1960 alone, the Social Security database lists that 107 Vickie’s were born in West Virginia. They were all spelled different ways, however.
Ed Miliband: Where there was once sneezy snotty talk from the nose. Unleashed were fiery, ferocious, bright red flames.
Me: "Yep"
A blend of fantasy and Caribbean folklore, at its heart this tale is about identity and self acceptance—because only by acknowledging her imperfections can Scotch hope to save her brother.
I've witnessed up close -- often way too close -- how combat has morphed from soldier vs. soldier (now a rarity in Africa) to soldier vs. civilian. Most of today's African fighters are not rebels with a cause; they're predators. That's why we see stunning atrocities like eastern Congo's rape epidemic, where armed groups in recent years have sexually assaulted hundreds of thousands of women, often so sadistically that the victims are left incontinent for life. What is the military or political objective of ramming an assault rifle inside a woman and pulling the trigger? Terror has become an end, not just a means.
A West Nyack, New York, native, Ali set out to be a food writer. Armed with an undergraduate degree in writing, she quickly realized she “wanted to help people in a way food writing wasn’t going to.”
So I picked up a few glass jars at Hobby Lobby (50% off baby!) and bought a fresh supply of crayons, markers and colored pencils (and don't worry...all of them are the washable kind!). Then I just put them in the jars and placed them on the kitchen counter where the "hot spot" used to be. In the drawer directly below, I placed paper...and only paper. Scissors and stick glue are kept out of reach of the littles.
Yeah, thank goodness.
Vert: 30,000'
The bookshelves on either side will hold books that meet my requirements of both functional and “pretty.” I’d love for the area above the desk space to hold some vintage-y treasures, but I’m thinking if I spring for seeded glass, they could disguise more practical items!
Jacksonville.com comments, Craigslist, and Tea Party groups are places where old white people can get together online, say shameful, racist things that they could never get away with saying anywhere else in the real world, and bond over their shared terror.
The Successors of St. Peter mentioned had these “secret” papers published so that the plans of the Secret Societies of the Synagogue to subvert the Church might be made known to the whole of Christendom and thereby put the Church on guard as to prevent, then hopefully, such “universal catastrophe” – the equivalent of St. Matthew’s great tempest in Greek – from taking place.
The King's Speech
In 1995, the FDA was forced to release, under the Freedom of Information act, a list of ninety-two symptoms caused by aspartame reported by thousands of victims:
It’s not that either of us have doubts. It’s just that we both come with some pretty heavy luggage. Mine is in the shape of four young humans. I need to get some things together before I rock their world. Idgie is a little better at thinking with her head than I am. I’m all emotions these days. Sometimes I think she knows me better than I know myself.
Thank you, Tristan, for dropping in and congrats, Zoraida, on the release!
The scratching sounds of a small flock of house sparrows on the metal roof above my head have reminded me of more recent sightings and trends.
"Paul!" I shrieked, hardly daring to believe my eyes "Look! Same airport, same destination, exactly twelve hours before our plane is due to take off...".
Special Reader Discount: Get 25% off both the Digital and Online magazine editions:
my friends and relatives think that i should leave him. my parents doesn’t know. well, it’s a bit complicated. am i naive to think that i’m the only one thinking of my child’s welfare?
* 2 tsp chipotle pepper spice
The reviews on this place were through the roof, on top of that tapas and wine just sounded perfect! I also read that reservations at this place mean nothing, so I went ahead to make a reservation anyway. I was thinking to possibly bring a +/- $15 bottle of wine, so I had then called to see if they had a corkage fee, Ceylan the Assistant Manager picked up the phone and had mentioned it was $25. She also offered to send me via email the updated wine list for my consideration. Well, I thought $25 was pretty pricey considering the $15 bottle I was intending on bringing. So I checked out what she sent which was 18 pages in PDF of wines primarily from Spain, Portugal, Argentina, Chile, California, France & Italy with most of the focus on Spain of course. I was amazed at the selection of wines they offered which started at about $24 and almost 40 available by the glass. Prices all relative and on average to restaurant pricing.
Sometimes it’s good to be politically correct, and sometimes people become hyper-sensitized, seeing evil and wrong every where. I’d say take such brands with a grain of salt, but may I should say a grain of pepper.
every year from FAAC, so the
system on roads showing destinations, type of cycling route from separated facilities to shared, and distance in some cases. There is some cycling infrastructure as one travels about. It varies from signed routes for cycling, closely spaced sharrows on streets, to bike lanes some with coloured crossings, and to red coloured bike lanes. The bike lanes are usually not wide enough for comfortable cycling or to attract more than the most confident.
Well, not really. It is probably the worst kept secret in the beer world of late that the enfant terribles of their own 'craft' beer world, BrewDog were eager, some might say desperate, to clinch a deal with Camra to have some sort of presence at the festival.
Our work will be seen as strong and clean and good.
On the day of Keeslar’s hearing, more than 100 men, women, and children showed up on the footsteps of the LaGrange County Courthouse to protest her arrest and take a stand for birthing rights. According to Richard Muntz, Keeslar’s attorney, the hearing was waived and a plea of “not guilty” was declared on Keeslar’s behalf.
We have countless confessions. Wernher Von Braun, the guy behind the Apollo projects, said on his deathbed that they were going to use a fake alien invasion as an excuse for genocide.
Thanks, sweetie.
it was as if the world momentarily stopped, and I realized that.............
After a few weeks of training, many women are known to have ‘dropped a dress size’ which is another great benefit. It is reported to burn around 450 calories every 30 minutes! Burning energy this quickly can lead to feeling hungry so I would recommend taking a sensible diet into account.
The others may come and go, but CP is still here – since 1997 – that says it all!
However, Craig Murray, a former British Ambassador to the region, has put the matter rather differently:
My brother Steve made an appearance.
I had to much fun, and it was nice to have a reason to
riches
1. The Vagina Monologues - If you've never heard of it, The Vagina Monologues is a powerful play written by Even Ensler that is performed across college and university campuses across the world in support of V-Day, a global movement to end violence against women and girls. The Vagina Monologues is an incredible production that will leave you with tears of laughter, joy and sadness all in the scope of 2 hours. It's unbelievably powerful and I can honestly say that this production has completely shaped who I am. Growing up, I was actively involved in theater and when I started college, I started as a theater major, but after being cast in The Vagina Monologues my freshman year and subsequently producing/directing it my sophomore year, I took the jump and changed my major to Political Science, with a minor in International Affairs, so that I could devote my career to women's rights issues. It has been 7 years since that first production and now, at the same time that I'm writing a Master's thesis on women's participation in peacebuilding processes in societies transitioning from conflict, I have also been cast in NYU's graduate production of The Vagina Monologues. I'm unbelievably excited to be ending my academic career in the same way I started on this path...with this unbelievable production. If you live in the New York City area and are interested in coming to the show, please let me know. All proceeds benefit the V-Day Campaign, this year's Spotlight Campaign which focuses on women and girls in Haiti, and a local NYC organization that assists victims of domestic violence and sex trafficking. If you're interested in learning more about V-Day, or The Vagina Monologues, check out the website here: http://www.vday.org/home.
I love orange slices. Since it was Christmas time, I went for the cherry slices. They taste really good dipped in dark chocolate melt. This is probably the easiest thing I made. It totally added color to the dessert table.
He discussed all of them with me and I smiled and nodded politely. He is not an impulsive man, so I knew a decision was going to take a while. In the meantime we could go on as we have been with me sneaking over to bump up the thermostat every time his back was turned.
I received an e-mail today from the progressive-liberal “moveon.org” petition site and newsletter babble, It disturbed me for many reasons. For starters, I am not a “member” of the site, i’m certainly not liberal, but my main concern was that it hit home, here in the CLE. (Cleveland) Read for yourself:
May 5th: Heavy Seas Blues at the Brewery, Halethorpe: International blues artist Deanna Bogart will be performing with her band. Heavy Seas beer, and food concessions from Koopers Chowhound Wagon, will be available onsite for purchase. $20. 7:30-11pm. www.hsbeer.com/blues-brewery.
i'm not exactly writing this from the i've-got-it-all-figured-out perspective.
How many of us can humbly admit that patience is not our strongest quality? We expect microwaveable results where we pray and God pops the blessing!
98 Hamlet – William Shakespeare
Looking for a finger licking good chicken marinade recipe? Look no further than this sticky honey soy recipe. It only takes a few ingredients and if you don’t have them in the pantry, add them! You will be able to cook more Chinese style meals.
I am sitting at my desk at work, and literally just started to cry enough that I had to excuse myself.
Light Weight CS in white from Fabriano for the layer....
To add insult to injury, you will probably be served over a bed of cous cous and vegetables that evening while his tribe absorbs those “smarts” by eating your brain.
You probably never heard of this law due to an extremely strict gag order placed upon politicians, media personnel, and bank officers. Even though Alex Jones or Ron Paul will not tell you about it, the law is still valid.
I'll order a coffee, find a table by the window, and settle in for a hour or so, sipping my coffee, reading my book, and pretending I'm sitting in a Paris café on a rainy day. I'll delight in the time I've carved out for myself, doing something I enjoy.
When it was Father’s Day we had a little family lunch party and I decided to make an old family favourite, sherry trifle, for pudding. More recently we have called it raspberry trifle because Nick’s absolute favourite fruit is raspberries.
No invective.
Chelsea is married & prego with #3! Time keeps passing
Since the crime rate against women in the country is rather high, Eye Poking Wear is very popular among the young ladies. The thorns can poke and blind the eyes of rapist the moment they lay their eyes on their would be victims.
Usually I stick with home parties to keep cost down, but this time I decided to hold the party off base. Thinking of a bunch of little three-year-olds running around my house made me dizzy. But having a party at a location can get really costly, so what I did was hold the party at our local children's museum on the day and time when the musuem offered free admissions to locals. This worked out perfect because the parents could bring other children . You'd be surprise how many local venues have a free admission day.
Imagine with me for a moment that on the structure of this garden is a giant window with large panes right above the squares. Can you envision that that would be an inspiration to replicate on the ground? Hmmmm, still with me? Imagine it in another setting and the window possessed a palladium window above it? Setting that curve at the top of the cut squares could be interesting.
on that Saturday afternoon!! Two thirds of those people were in
Since mother's day is coming up super-duper soon, these flowers would be a great quick and easy craft for little ones (I did mine with a three-year-old) to make for their moms or grandmas.
figures of Our Lord, Our Lady, angels and saints. Oracular spirits
As I said earlier, this is a successful combination - bitter shreds of peel, sweet chunks of apricot and a rich buttery cake to offset it all. Rather happily consumed by my work colleagues. And rather appropriately, I started this blog 400 posts ago with a marmalade cake for my very first post :-) I have indeed reached 400 posts and although those who find the time to blog every day will no doubt scoff at my measly total, I'm rather proud of myself!
2 t. vanilla
- Well you still are sort of robbing somebody...-
My best advice from years of being involved in weddings: Keep your decisions simple and confident. Don’t be swayed. Set expectations with everyone so feelings don’t get hurt and your ideas don’t get compromised. Don’t get to the point of saying you just want to elope instead of having a wedding. The stress isn’t worth it. And if you really, truly, want to just run off and say your vows at City Hall like we are, you absolutely should!
I had to rush home and grab dinner before we dashed off to yet another concert - this time, Steve Earle and the Dukes. Awesome, totally amazing. I've seen him before, but on his "Townes" tour where it was just him on stage. This was much more rockin'. Highly recommended.
I hope you are looking forward to the New Year. It's going to be important.
Ah, yes, Haggard: he was more right wing than even me! He made me look like a liberal! There are a number of writers... Even the strictly police procedural, whodunnit thrillers, there are chaps now forgotten who I thought wrote brilliant police thrillers. Maurice Procter: do you know his name at all?
How can you be so unaware of your surroundings, or put servers so low on the totem pole that you honestly think anyone in an apron is the same person?
You want to leave your reader feeling satisfied, you need an ending that makes the reader feel like all their time and effort was worth it. Which is the best possible advertisement for your next book. Or even an incentive to read that book again.
I just may be a little in love with baskets. It's a sickness....
(Source: DailyOm)
Here’s where the fine print begins.
Let yourself feel the pain
The squash on the other hand are nicely cosseted indoors. I sowed these at the beginning of the month, with two seeds to a pot. Both the varieties 'Barbara' and 'Victory' have germinated in full, whereas the 'Honey Bear' have been reluctant to show. Of 18 seeds, only one solitary plant has made an emergence.
Anyways, school has been pretty crazy, and I’ve been working my tail off to get projects and papers done last minute. Add in massive procrastination and you’ve got me; a stressed-out college kid.
Proof positive: they wink at me.
If you are inserting someone else's button, you need to type their address in where it asks for their link.
Every Mercury retrograde is different. And there are generally three Mercury retrogrades each year. This particular Mercury retrograde hits you where you work! It makes your job, and your day to day tasks, frustrating because of errors, delays, lost paperwork, confused communications, computer difficulties, canceled appointments, and just a nightmare of glitches that makes your life tough! Some of these might even impact your health. Possibly, old health issues will resurface. ("My rash is back!") Difficulties with partners and close friends could aggravate your frustration. Fortunately, parties, vacations, romance, sports, and fun stuff are blessed! You win some -- you lose some. (You'll be fine.)
from my worked land
Xerut-worship-juvak
...now all you have to do is get the book!
Kids: Quiet. Contemplating.
To be eligible for the giveaway, you are to create a card that utilizes your recycled Christmas scraps, and then come back to the TSG Blog to add your name and a link to your project in the InLinkz that is located at the bottom of this challenge post. This challenge is open until the winner has been announced on the following Monday (Jan. 3rd). The winner will get a $5 gift certificate to use in the TSG Web store!
Pygmalionism gone awry, RUTHLESS AMBITION explores the life of Cassie Kincaid, an unattractive schizophrenic whose self-serving goals morph from innocent to insidious as she terrorizes her way to the top.
carpeted area of the living
Answering God, Eugene Peterson, 23-32
that the only way to get him into office is to stop being against the
Back to the placemats. There are several different styles and colors out there. My round daisy tiled bamboo mats were actually bought for a totally different reason than for setting a table. They have such a great organic and rhythmic shape! The initial plan was to make wall art out of them, but the perfect spot hasn't presented itself yet and I haven't been able to bring myself to paint them like I'd originally planned. When placed on my dark stained dinning table, I was surprised to find I might just use them for what they were intended for! Miracles never cease:)
He tells Joey that he's preparing a portrait of him: "I can't take it with me to France -- there would be no point, right? So I'm going to send it off to your friend Albert, just so that he'll know that I meant what I said when I promised I would look after you." At one point, the captain confesses to Joey that he's pessimistic about the outcome of the war, and that he and a person named Jamie are the only ones who think the Germans might actually win.
Writing volumes of books, yet to be published
156. My rain barrel
By Jonna Petry
BF: Yes. That’s right.
Learning what not to do can be just as important, or in some circumstances more important, than learning what to do. A former boss of mine used to waste his staffs time in long, de-motivating, unproductive meetings. Meetings can be enormous Time Trash. Seriously, who needs to hold a 4 hour meeting? That is a waste of time, money-making hours, and a lack of respect for the employees.
This story continues to perplex me, I wonder how in the world Americans look at this situation unfolding and added to the DOJ policy of not pursuing any cases that involve blacks in civil rights violations i.e the Black Panthers voter intimidation case…and don’t see a double standard? This is the epitome of “social justice” unfortunately our Constitution calls for “EQUAL justice” and for a group of public officials to be so inept at following the RULE OF LAW…(I find that in and of itself ironic since this IS the Depart. of JUSTICE…this too is an example of civil rights run amok…when a “protected class” means special treatment to the detriment of others. I guess we are in Animal Farm where some people are more equal than others…What message does that send to groups like the Black Panthers? The message it sends is like their advocates at the DOJ they are above the law…that because they have the ear of the powerful they are above the law…
Silence is golden yes its true
4 events
In Iran, a dramatic rise in anti-Semitism occurred in 1968. In 1979-1980,
The "beach" was passable for a beach when I consider I'm no longer in California so I need to lower my expectations. (Please note I have on a California sweatshirt. Just keepin' the dream alive baby.)
I don't really do them, resolutions I mean. Instead, I focus on a word for the year. Generally I come up with some lame play on words for the year (this was last year's feeble attempt and the year before that was two thousand and zen, god love me). But I'm having none of that this year, and not just because twelve is, like, really, really hard to work with. Twelve basically rhymes with nothing useful and with one short syllable I was venturing into territory even more rocky than last year's two thousand health-heaven. No, I'm having none of that silly word play business. It's... distracting.
3. In a large salad bowl add the tomatoes and cucumber and toss in as many greek olives as you desire. If you don’t have greek olives then the recipe can work just as well with other varieties. I favour a mix between black olives and stuffed green olives with pimento.
Students see no wrong -
So we DO have that going for us, and we very much look forward to our quarterly visits with each other.
A typical Tony Bennett-type early 60's double-tracked pop single "Just a Simple Melody."
Both methods have their pros and cons and I don't think we can say either one is the "right" way because any way you store up food is going to bless your family, but I think we should consider carefully before we choose what is right for our own families. I am no expert but I have, obviously, chosen to store whole foods and I will tell you why.
The Memphis chapter will be able to add more programs for children later this year with the opening of a $31 million Ray and Joan Kroc Corps Community Center. It’s one of 34 centers nationwide funded by a $1.6 billion gift from McDonald’s heiress Joan Kroc when she died in 2003.
After writing and posting this article this morning, I had a “stumble upon” experience, or what I prefer to call a God leading. I saw copy of Time magazine in an office and picked it up. It contained an article about Nones.
11:45am: Leave for Laundromat
I have used some handmade paper string to create a crinkled layer and made a bow from this and some raffia. The ribbon has been recycled from a box of chocolates, the raffia from a plant label has a couple of metal charms tied into it. The sentiment is included in the download and has been cut into a banner shape and curled up at the edges.
At last, Cash Arrives! Fox News entertainment correspondent Courtney Friel and hubby CNN biz correspondent Carter Evans celebrated the joyous new year with the birth of their son, Cash Hudson Evans. Their beautiful baby boy was born at 6:08 a.m. ET this morning and weighed in at 9 pounds.
"Patterns! Yes, patterns! That's what I'll do!" She cried,
May this list of places I'd like to eat at in 2012 stave off the hanger, at least for another three hours.
Buyers with smaller down payments can expect to pay more for FHA mortgage insurance premiums, which have risen to 1.75 percent of the loan total. Bankrate.com cites an example illustrating the higher fees: A borrower who takes out a $200,000 FHA loan will likely have to pay about $3,500 for mortgage insurance upfront.
Under the water
Elizabeth Wilmshurst did state there was no substantive difference between her views and the attorney general’s pre-7 March. I did enjoy Wilmshurt’s response when Sir John Chilcot asked if it made a difference that Jack Straw himself is a qualified lawyer?. Elizabeth Wilmshurt replied…“He is not an International Lawyer”. Rather sums it up, I think?
So when I made my favourite Smoked Salmon and Cream Cheese Bagel, with herbs, I used the bagel cutter!
* Quickutz 2x2 Holly Leaves
Here's some inspiration I found online. Don't you just love??
Bless you, my friend. May the Lord bless you and keep you. May he make his face shine upon you, be gracious to you and give you peace.
C: … mauuwi pa rin sa conviction.
By far my favourite character in French Relations is the horse that Tash is gifted by her mother and stepfather in a rash moment - the Foxy Snob. He is deliciously French in attitude, snooty and disdainful about Tash and her efforts to ride him. He is a wonderfully brave and courageous horse across country, he comes to adore his scatty owner, and is just so brilliantly written. I am a massive fan of horses - was a reader of many pony books during my childhood - and Snob is one of my very favourite literary equine heroes. Here's a snippet:
6 ounces Gorgonzola
Betty drops a whiskey and coke and an ashtray full of water in front of its respective drinkers before me and Moon quickly indulge. I hand Betty me fiver and she winks before heading off for my change.
How the heck do you handle it when people say "Oh my you must have your hands full?" I have three boys and I hear that CONSTANTLY. I'm so tired of hearing people say that!
"The Lord was grieved that he had made man of the earth,
EUC benefits kick in directly after workers have exhausted their regular state unemployment benefits. They’re structured in tiers.
First of all:
- Ian Carr / trumpet, flugelhorn
Patrick Fahey: I could die. Owls are so cute. I'm traveling to watch videos on youtube until my derma rots from my body. brb.
clamp down
I have a theory that grannies actually go out their way to become ill, just for something to talk about. As soon as a new flu strain comes out, they start rubbing themselves against victims like affectionate cats, hoping to contract the disease and brag about it to their friends. Just like fans who queue up overnight to get the latest iPhone or to get tickets for their favourite band, old women will line up round the block to catch a dose of the clap from a homeless chap.
FOLLOWING - this can be a touchy subject. Not everyone is my cup of tea, just like I am not everyone else's cup of tea. I follow a blogs that do not follow me back, and there are people who follow me that I do not follow back. If I'm not following you, I'm not saying that I don't think your blog is good, it may just be beyond me (I only have a little brain). I appreciate every follower I get - believe me, I do a little jig each time someone new follows me, and I can't help feel a little hurt each time someone unfollows me too. I'm working on it.
Living in Sin
UPDATE, May 2010
10 coarsely chopped Oreo cookies for the topping
As matters stand, trying to protect UK companies is like attempting to guard chickens in a coop to which foxes have been invited.
The Dept of Agriculture also undertook to pay the farmers at the borderline an amount of R50,000 per km to erect a jackal-proof, 1,5m high 6strand fence with 900mm high wire netting. Farmers had register as 'service providers' with the Department so that they could submit invoices and get paid for the fencing they paid to erect. The Dept of Police, Roads and Transport also undertook to repair the entire patrol-road from Zastron to QwaQwa to the extent that it would be made accessible to 4x vehicles.
2. Rock Me Baby (King, Josea) 2:58
Back in 2008, at the exact time the financial crisis hit, I was moving to start a new life in Denmark because it was clear that no matter how hard I worked and no matter how much I sacrificed my health to be the bread winner, I would never get ahead in Britain. I live with Fibromyalgia and I am slowly losing my mobility and I was told in 2007 to start working part time but I never could afford to. My husband Ray has never been able to get a job in Britain due to a crippling combination of health problems but because I could work just about he was never eligible for benefits and I got no help or support for caring for him on top of everything else. We decided to risk it all and move to a new country in the hope it could provide us both with a better support network and job opportunities. I can say after being here 3 years now we were right.
Dear Reader,
I am extremely blessed to have a great wife as well as very good friends. Together they tossed me a party in honor of TFC's release.
You know I am loving the Chevrons Die-namics from last month. So I cut some of the larger chevron to cover my card stock.
Second suggestion: more hands-on practice. While people were actively encouraged to come up and participate, there simply wasn't time or ingrediants for everyone to have a go at making a full cocktail. Which brings me too...
-1 clove garlic, grated
Remember what I said about time viewed as merely a concept? I wish I was kidding. It takes a few years to figure it out if you are an American and accustomed to being able to receive three free months if the cable guy is too late. We Americans come from the land of the thirty minute pizza delivery, or it`s free, mentality. The first time I had cable installed on the island I was told he would arrive somewhere around 2 o`clock on a Thursday. I assumed this meant somewhere between one and four, but I was wrong. He got there at precisely 2 o`clock, no problem, but on Saturday. Plumbers show up days after your pipes burst, and, in one apartment I went without a doorknob for three weeks. It just had a rag shoved into the hole where the knob should be and I locked my apartment with the bolt lock only. So, do I expect the movers to be here on time? I will be out getting a cup of coffee and a paper to read. I might even stroll through the park next to me one last time. If I don`t I will simply sit here and fume to the boiling point, and that is in celcius down here. Of course, with my Murphy`s Law stamped life, if I dare leave, they will come. If you do not see any postings for longer than a week, come visit me? I hear the Mexican jails are lovely this time of year. ¡Salud!
With only a few exceptions, it’s one long song. Rolling Stone’s Kurt Loder said it best: “You could count the actual melodies here on Mickey Mouse’s fingers.” The ones that stand out are recycled from “Mother”, “The Final Cut”, “In The Flesh” and “The Fletcher Memorial Home”, and the effect isn’t so much clever self-reference but laziness and lack of inspiration. “Sexual Revolution” attempts to provide a beat, but it turns out this was a Wall reject. He delivers “Go Fishing” so histrionically it’s no wonder she left him in the country. The title track is catchy, but the cryptic references to Yoko Ono, Dick Tracy and Shane only make it seem like another dream. The song everyone likes is “Every Stranger’s Eyes”, which is mostly one of his litany lists, but has enough of a decent backing to make it soar.
Still waiting for Spring, though with increasing impatience. I woke up to frost and then the sky threw lumps of ice at me on the way in to the office.
his back the
This evening I’m thinking I must have found enough heart stones now and am feeling the love of the present moment as I walk the beach again with my dog.
What's that you say? A banana in place of a hotdog? Yeah, seems a little strange, but really... peanut butter and banana sandwiches aren't that uncommon. You might like them. Try them and you may I say. This is actually something that my older son saw on a mini show called Ze Fronk, back when Disney Junior was Playhouse Disney. He's loved it ever since. And it's really easy to make. So easy, I kinda feel silly showing you how. But I'm going to anyway.
State: Hot, kinda chillin. Working from home…
eaglets grow with the help of their wise
Anyway, I did manage to get some pics from the iPad, which are crappy! How does this thing not take good pictures?? With all the technology from Apple, you'd think they would manage to put a decent camera on their iPad...But, I needed photographic evidence of Ingrid's first ballet class, so here are some grainy shots of her in leotard, tights, slippers, and her hair pulled back. You have no idea how hard it is for me to get her to pull her freakin' hair back, so this is major!
Oh and by the way…..its Canadian.
Somehow, though, lying just isn’t as funny when adults do it. I hope my son doesn’t get too sophisticated too quickly. I don’t want to have to not laugh at his lies. I mean his jokes.
1/2 lb. shrimp (or any white fish)
I'm a working man and a father of three young children who need me around.
The second story is a modern day tale of Holly, an abandoned infant on Christmas Eve. Adopted by Christmas store owner Mr. Goodnight, Holly leads a happy and joyful life with her 'father'. A writer gets wind of her story of abandonment and wants to write a novel about her. Holly feels that maybe it is time to come to grips with her past and agrees. The author, Van falls for Holly as he is writing the story. What does best friend and childhood playmate Owen feel about that?
Honestly...you should check it out. I've started using it and it has made the past week so much more stress free when it comes to meal planning and cooking.
This ruling also reflects the general view shared by the ECJ in previous case law, ie that the duty to detect and stop IP infringements in the online world is exclusively placed upon IPRs owners, as it occurs in the offline environment.
As I dunk my Rich Tea biscuit into my cup of out-of-date typhoo tea, I discover to my horror they have changed! They're all thin in the middle and sort of...Holey...I'm not sure when they changed but as no-one told me I feel cheated. Has anyone else noticed? Who do I complain to? Ach sure i'll call Orange again and take it out on them.
Opening was originally projected for June 2012, but will be dependent upon renovation and reconstruction of the premises, which may take longer than that.
"Let's Move," says the Obama White House. But Obama's Labor Department is telling some workers to slow down.
Yes its true, I took my CA plates off my car yesterday! It was all a rush of emotions! The first thing Andrew asked me when he came home to seeing me putting the new plates on my car was.....are you ok???? In a very concerned tone. I love how he knows me so well. Im sure had it been a different time of the month, I would have been a complete wreck, but I was fine. At least I get to keep my CA plates right! And...I have to think ive got a nice souvenir when I finally move back to CA!
Chapter Four:
Donna’s barn half full of hay.
I am a little nervous about beginning to share with my student this time of year. As we return from our April break, the next big break on the horizon is summer. It very quickly becomes the “second to last time…” or the “final…” whatever it is in our daily routines. It won’t be long before they realize that they will be moving on to 6th grade, but the iPads will be staying in 5th grade with me. I look forward to hearing their end-of-the-year reflections about this experience as well as their advice for what I should do with my students next year.
I hope that no one was harmed anywhere and that damage was minimal. West of here seemed to get hit the hardest. Need to check my blog list to see how the rest of you in Texas and Louisiana made out. Hope all is well with all of you and yours.
An odd day of ups and downs was today. This morning I concluded Ive been in a bad mood for 3 months which is totally counter to my nature. Usually, I can't carry a grudge or bad mood for a day. I remember my sister got sent to bed without supper once for tearing up my one of a kind irreplaceable keepsake diary. That night I snuck food up to her. Yet here I am feeling permanently stuck under a black cloud.
Cassandra Archer is the Huntress. She has faithfully served the Earth Mother for years, rescuing kidnapped children from monsters - both human and supernatural - dwelling in the abandoned ruins of the Barrows district of Duivel, Missouri.
John Cho is also in this, as Teddy, the fish guy. Disclaimer here: I’ve never seen “Harold and Kumar.” Either of them. Sorry, universe. So this was my first outing with John Cho, and I have to say I enjoyed it, to the point that I spent both showings of “Star Trek” reminding myself that he was called Sulu over there. But the guy is funny! And snarky, and you do come out with a new respect for people who make fish, as well as an odd subculture surrounding sushi and tourists. He and Nicholas Brendan don’t get used nearly enough, which is why their fish-versus-cake battle royal is one of my more memorable plots.
“The one you hit with the Pan…” the Detective states.
For those of you new to me and my blogging, I currently make and sell jewelry and gem trees as well as I am the author of Gem Tree Sculptures. I don't sell my art which is watercolor and acrylic painting (yet), although you could lump my jewelry and gem trees into the category of art. Hubby and I just started last year taking photographs and that has been a blast. I get so many good ideas for my paintings from the photos as well as the beauty of the photos themselves.
I really enjoy meeting folk at craft fairs, I'm not shy and love chatting away at my craft stand or online for that matter. But put me in front of a camera and I freeze!
Some Important Factors to Consider When Looking for Replacement Windows
“I thought he’s going to beg me to stay. What if I couldn’t figure out what I owe him ? What if he give up on me?”
SMBWAAT - Sunglasses Must Be Worn At All Times
Following their electoral victories in Parliament, Egypt’s most organized political group has offered assurances that it would respect the 1979 peace treaty with Israel.
- Colton has successfully latched twice to breast feed.
Colors are always effected by what's adjacent to them.
Subject: YOUR VERY STUPID
This is the last and final post of the 'Overseas Chinese' post series, which form part of the 'Year of China' theme for this yr.
Yes folks, that is 31 yr- old Macaulay Culkin looking awfully thin in New York City.
flows the stream of the oil of gladness,
A part of me still thought they were kidding and was waiting for them to let me in on it. But nope, it was a planned, thought out gift. For some reason, while shopping for my birthday, they saw this little bovine beauty and thought OMG! That is SO her!
"Well, Greg, I'm peeling the potatoes"
Really, he could care less about me, he wants to be by Daddy every minute of the day, he is who he asks for the minute he wakes up and the person he wants to put him to bed. Daddy hung the Moon and the rest of us are just props in the sky.
Bring 4 cups of water to a boil in a large saucepan. Add the lentils and a pinch of salt and return to a boil. Lower the heat, cover and cook for about 20 minutes until the water is absorbed. Let cool and move the lentils to a large mixing bowl. Mash them with a fork, potato masher or your hands until they are completely mashed.
The story of David, one of the greatest of all Kings of Israel is probably the most well known of all Bible stories. Here is a great version of this story.
…but the sports company (incredibly) isn’t an official sponsor of the games. Nike’s competitor, Adidas, is!
It is going to be a horrible ordeal for her children who are left without a loving mother. They already had less than dad material when it came to Jesus, but the glue that held that family together is gone. How will these children cope?
Yes, you still look so beautiful, in that tragic kind of way
121. “Change is the law of life and those who look only to the past or present are certain to miss the future.” – John F. Kennedy
1. “We Almost Lost Detroit” by Dale Earnhardt Jr. Jr.
This still leaves two questions hanging over the wreckage: As our roads expert puts it: the village needs to know why this junction was up-graded in the first place. Also, the tax-payer needs to know who paid for the work.
I ponder life's problems driving to work, always. I have composed some awesome blog posts in my head. But as soon as I get to work, they are forgotten, because I must deal with the mundaneness of work. I probably get enough time to wonder as I drive to/from work and maybe I don't need to write it all down. It is enough to think it through in my head. I defy being there every minute for my kid and embrace the lazy parenting attitude.
But I have to admit that eReader technology has really resonated with my passion for reading. You may have guessed this from my earlier posts considering the benefits and challenges of eReaders. Today, eReading can be done from all kinds of devices, including mobile phones, iPods and the oh-so-popular tablet category. But once upon a time, eReaders were a category all on their own. Traditional eReaders like the Amazon Kindle, Sony eReader or the Kobo were initially created just to read books. They worked (and many still do) with eInk technology –more like those PDAs your dad was so fond of in the early 2000s. While tablets like the iPad and the BlackBerry Playbook have LCD screens and have all kinds of fun apps and browsing capabilities, eReaders are still very limited in their features. The Amazon Kindle now has browsing (though I’m kind of scared to imagine browsing on an eInk screen) and the Canadian-made Kobo now has a Touch edition (in the image above). However, apps and video are out of the question on an eInk screen. There is one major reason: eInk only seems to work in black and white and is nowhere close to the fine detail of HD. Not to mention the fact that as you “turn a page”, the transition is not always smooth- you may see the fading letters of the previous page for a few seconds.
“Oh, I almost forgot.”
And of what is
If you are ever in downtown Baltimore, check out James Joyce for a perfectly poured beer, a nice scotch, and some good old Irish hospitality.
"North Carolina's Tretetam is a quietly abstract affair. Tretetam relies primarily on synth and found sounds, accompanied occasionally by other instruments as he crafts ambient pieces to occupy the space between conscious and subconscious.
However, there has been a resurgence in the neighborhood. I wanted to see it. My daughter was off work that day, so we decided to make the trek together. Just like my trek the week before, it was a gray and rainy day, only this time the temperature had dropped 20 degrees. Instead of being delightful with a hint of spring, it was cold with a hint of winter.
The prompt was to write about three objects I see from my computer.
Kimbolton School has murals by Pellegrini. They give a sense of grandeur and seriousness and create a suitable frame of mind for study.
I’m not arrogant, but I’m not unsure about myself either. I’m not mean, but I don’t let people walk over me either. I’m not a bad guy, but I can be a hero. I’m working on my legend. This is my legend. This is my story, I am who I am, and I’m proud of who I am… I am Neo D AKA Niels
Naturally gentle and skin-friendly for daily use.
"That's your lot" said Miss Lee as she turned on the light
Date of Origin Saturday June 11th, 2011 approx. 03:30 PM
See related, recent Grits posts:
I am from the great mountains of New Jersey, a big town called West Milford. Ultimately I would like to live in the Village, like a true hipster.
As you exhale send that feeling of peace to families of Brandon, Jason, Juan and Peter.
December 14
So what was New York like? Everything we'd hoped for at twice the scale. An all-absorbing, truly incredible metropolis - a clean, friendly and super-safe city (we were strolling around the back streets at 11 pm, riding the subways and mooching Central Park as dusk turned to dark – and felt perfectly fine and unrattled). Instantly familiar from films, TV (and comics) we were immediately installed, settled and at home from the first footsteps into Fifth Avenue.
No arrests had been made by Tuesday afternoon. Both Demings and Tavernier said the arrests would likely take place in multiple jurisdictions.
And then i started in on the linen napkins and other hankies that i have. Starched the napkins and put them in the buffet and ironed the hankies (ladies hankies...i must have around 50 of them...my grandmother put a new one in her pocketbook every day...she was very proper that way) and put them in the dresser drawer. i intend to use them.
It requires so little energy on my part and my Husband is the perfect companion for my snarky / admiring/joking remarks.
I wanted to blurt out everything, not just about the bedbugs but also about the many frustrations I had with this new city that didn’t yet feel mine. And I wanted him to still love me, if he had ever loved me, so that he could listen to my complaints, take me into his arms and assure me that everything was going to be O.K.
Thomas Brunt covers the Texas Rangers for briefsports101.com, follow his personal Twitter feed here: @BHS_SPORTSGUY, email him: thesportsguy.brunt2@gmail.com
What, you might be wondering, is my excuse for such a prolonged period of absence from writing? At least I hope somebody is wondering that or I may as well not trouble myself. I’ve never been much of a writer and I struggle even at my least busy to output my thoughts in such a way that people might actually want to read them but whether I ever achieve that aim is less than certain anyway, so I may as well endeavour to become a more productive blogger.
My professor was right. There are only a finite number of species of all kinds of life that exist in this world. Each one should be carefully guarded, because once it is gone it is gone.
I am lovin' my 3 day weekend! Yes, yes, YES! I know we've only been in school 8 days this year, but boy was I needing a day to sleep in again! I was so thankful for the long winter break, but it was really hard for me to get in gear again!
Me: What’s the Blackberry Playbook?
The script had some really cool moments as well. I thought the convenience store scene was inspired. I mean you were IN that store, BEGGING for a way out just like Jeremy. That’s the scene that officially woke me up from my slumber.
Mark Roberts is an editor of P76 magazine and has had wide experience in small press publishing. He will be writing a regular col­umn on small presses and magazines for EDITIONS.
I must clarify a few points. I am not fat, the boys are way too thin. I am not short either, they're both nearly 7ft.
As the group fully assembled (some of us were still finishing eating our lunch as the activity began) we resorted to the conventional circle time system of me sitting in front with the prints. I suggested that we decide together which ones "tell a story" and which ones do not. We created two categories in which to separate them: "Maybe" and "No." There might have been better ways to divide them up, but that's what came to us. As it turns out, only one of the 17 prints I brought with me wound up in the "No" pile. And instead of quickly going through them, we wound up actually telling the stories we discovered as we went.
"So you don't have a problem with what you have to do? You're not going to get violent with us?"
It seems 38 is not such a bad place to be. I have been gifted with good skin from my Mom and Grandmother so I don't look quite like a cougar yet. I have friends all over the world and all over the interwebs. I really don't need much. So what to you get for the girl who has everything?
…able to realize that I can make it though anything, long as I keep on breathing.
Just at the moment there are three especially annoying Book Threads.
We think this will be a great addition to sexy gypsy. And hopefully spark some healthy conversations in the comments. So check back later today for the first installment of the High Fidelity section.
Let it create me
The uncertain economic conditions are having a telling effect on the labour market in Australia and around the world, and the research findings represent a significant shift in employee attitudes compared to the same report conducted in 2011.
For anyone who has not seen the past years......
If you thought my dollar store kitchen makeover is complete, well, you'd be wrong! I've got some more posts coming up over the next few weeks, including my baking cupboard, my puppy cupboard, and my fridge among others. If anyone else has dollar store kitchen makeovers, I would love to see them! Always gathering inspiration from somewhere!
Wendell Berry says it another way: Our culture thinks it’s unwrapped the magic of sex by showing it in every conceivable context. Berry insists the opposite is actually true. We haven’t unwrapped anything, instead we’ve proven that the genuine oneness enjoyed by a married couple can’t be unwrapped. Sex in the context of marital intimacy is the great shining barrier that can’t be overcome. Our “unwrapping” is not removing an artificial facade to get a clearer view. It’s degrading a beauty because we can’t stand the thought of something holier than us.
Other foods produce undetectable levels or negligible concentrations of HCAs when they are grilled. These include soy-based veggie burgers, veggie brochettes, and portabello mushroom “steaks.” These healthy vegetarian alternatives are also low in fat and cholesterol.
But here’s the interesting part, that I have come to regard as highly significant. There is a new player in town, of inter-dimensional origin, which has been held back from taking actions to aid the Light due to very ancient accords, established among the “star races”. No, I’m not talking about the Galactic Federation. These beings are activated, for lack of a better description, when an evident imbalance occurs. The living earth beneath us is in the process of birthing but requires the energy of humanity to assist the transition. I do not know the extent to which they will be allowed to intervene, as they have on numerous occasions in recent years, but for those who are here to undergo the ascension process, I believe they will be receiving assistance in many ways. Even for those with highly developed psychic skills, direct communication with them is difficult but they do seed the dreams of many with updated “programming”. For several nights, my entire sleep period has been like attending a series of lectures… each time I rolled over, it was as if a new subject was being covered or a new page in a book. I cannot recall these “downloads” in detail and am trusting that the energy work they have me doing allows the newly-gained wisdom to be accessible to my inner soul.
If anything, “The Moon Moth” shows just how natural and powerful the two forms are as a team, and begs for further explorations in mining the rich philosophies of science fiction past for a new audience seeking substance rather than just special effects.
serves 6 to 8
Sunday was a different sort of performance. We have been rehearsing a performance created by improvisation, based on King Lear, for nine evenings and one weekend, and performed it on Sunday. Each of the nine of us shared the roles. With a loving, supportive, invited audience, I could reveal myself on stage. Jane emailed to a larger group,
Next: "The Fear" Imperial Pumpkin, due out later in September.
Now that I have established “to whom” Paul was writing…is writing, I would like to look at Ephesians 6:10 again, and think about “Being strong in the Lord”. I have run out of time today, but I think it will be a nice starting place for my next post.
What is man saying today? “We don’t need God. We can do anything God does.” Am I unduly criticising the sailors on that endangered boat? I think not. They were leaving God out of the equation. They were approaching it all from a humanistic standpoint.
On Wed 2/16/2011 3:46 PM, Johnstone provided O'Grady/SAPA with her comment:
There are still more hidden gems - Babar Mahal Revisited, Mike's Breakfast, Cafe Imago Dei, and the gardens of the sequestered Hotel Vajra. Gritty on the surface, modern Kathmandu secretly retains the laid-back ways that made Nepal so popular with road-weary backpackers 1970s hippie overland days.
When you were down did you wait for me to take you away?
I had the chords a bit wrong in AI theory version 5, but now that I wrote out the code I think the chords are OK.
-Sewing Machine
He folded his glasses, put them his pocket, and then clasped his hands. He looked like a judge, all except for the ugly brown fabric of his jacket. Judges only wore black.
“After that,” Manny ignored the tone in Pappy’s voice. After all, the old codger had just lost his home.
The internet has done some amazing things for communities, friendships, and communication in general. Digital conversations and in-person conversations have started to blend together, overlap, weave into one. Maybe it's due to the casual, chatter-like vibe of Twitter, or the on-the-go but still accessible nature of smart phone users. It's probably a little of both. Either way, it is fascinating to see how far technology has come in such a short time, how we can be miles apart and still interact with each other every single day. And so intimately, at that. We get to know someone so well that when we sit down to talk for the first time, it feels like (and is) the 500th.
Add the hot stock to the pot, bring to the boil, then turn down the heat and simmer until the celery and carrots (if using) are soft, about 5 - 7 minutes. Take off the heat, and leave the soup base to cool down.
Generally when we think of “allowance” we think of the few bucks our parents gave now and then for behaving within their guidelines, but it goes much deeper.
Patterned Paper - Webster's Pages - Yacht Club, Whale Watching
He's a 9-week-old English Angora rabbit, and he's now lives at Two Knit Wits. His name is Hank. (Get it?)
“It is very unusual,” he said.
I feel the urge to leave today, although no plans are in action for another trip to the desert.
She'll never be the same
Not all blond women are intelligent, of course. Hitler’s squeeze Eva Braun was a pitiful airhead. The Fuehrer, it seems, was attracted to women who wouldn’t give him backchat or point out the flaws in his bogus racial theories. Eva had the good sense, nevertheless, not to remove her knickers in public and keep schtum about her boyfriend’s peculiar bedroom tastes.
They are most easily identified as being clusters of tiny red nasties. Assassin bugs look a bit similar and are good guys - so don't kill them. Their babies are more solitary - so it's the cluster of red bug that's the good giveaway on who to kill. The long egg chain is also a good giveaway. Assassin bug eggs are more like clusters:
Now to something completely different, still related.
make it a good weekend
As for how the forced-dancing inmates reacted to Deputy Dominic Martucci’s firing, we can only speculate. Our best guess, it was something like: “Yeah!”
1/2 cup vegetable oil (USE COCONUT OIL or SPECTRUMS DAIRY FREE SOY FREE SHORTENING~melted)
(Please, read all verses from your Bible).
When I was in college I became particularly fond of a song by Nina Hagen called "Universal Radio." It was completely unlike any of the other music I was into at the time -- it was experimental-techno European dance music, while I was listening to Doctors' Mob, the Meat Puppets, the Reivers, and Husker Du. But I loved the song. It was completely original, and insane. She squeaks, she growls, she sings opera, she bellows, all in one song. All I knew about her was that she was German and a militant vegetarian -- this because she recorded a song with Lene Lovich on a lefty compilation tape I bought called "Don't Kill the Animals."
One of the richest persons in modern times was certainly Mother Theresa. She gave with such an abundant mindset, that it affected everyone she ever met. People were drawn to her because of the Manifesting Abundant Destiny she lived in the service to the poor in Calcutta and everywhere she went.
But then...there was Christmas. And they were journeying to JCK's mother's home to spend it with family. JCK fretted. She gnashed her teeth. She could just imagine BOY blurting out the "F word" at a most inappropriate time. Like during the blessing at dinner.
The glue on my flower and the stickles aren't dry in the pic because I was going out and had to take the photo because it would be too dark when I got back.
As the two men enjoy each other's company, bumping into each other repeatedly, we sense that we are being prepared for the real narrative and so it is twenty years later that the two men meet again, in a rail terminus once more, this time London's Liverpool Street Station, and Austerlitz reveals that he has been looking for someone 'to whom he could relate his own story, a story which he had learned only in the last few years and for which he needed the kind of listener I had once been in Antwerp.' This is because Jaques Austerlitz had actually been raised as Dafydd Elias, evacuated from Europe on the Kindertransport and raised by a pastor and his wife in Bala, Wales. It is just before his school exams that he receives the shocking news that the name he must legally write on the papers is not the one by which he has gone for so long, but a name which feels immediately alien.
Peep at each one separately, at their buttocks and thighs, lulled by the imaginings of porn.
We come back, and see AJ still in the ring, distraught over what happened, and here comes Natalya.
But in this instance, I just cant help myself. I wanted to show off a spanking new initiative between this firm (now nicknamed WB) and a major engineering firm.
Today I am doing bullet work. There is just one thing that must be done today and that is pay the Target bill. I have accomplished that and more. Here is my account.
Beth Greco
4. Read outside material related to what you are learning. When we cover SWOT analysis, for example, Google ‘SWOT’ and read some articles during the week. Work on SWOT analysis with a friend or colleague. Use it or lose it. Your brain creates a channel that gets deeper and more secure the more times you do something. Your emotions around the topic will change too, which is a great way to make it seem a wonderful thing.
Shocked yet thrilled by Grey's singular erotic tastes, Ana hesitates. For all the trappings of success – his multinational businesses, his vast wealth, his loving adoptive family – Grey is a man tormented by demons and consumed by the need to control. When the couple embarks on a passionate, physical and daring affair, Ana learns more about her own dark desires, as well as the Christian Grey hidden away from public scrutiny.
For those of you not familiar with the show, three or more sports analysts sit around a table and debate a several pre-selected topics from various sports. On Monday, Eric Mangini and Stephen A. Smith were there alongside Skip Bayless to discuss the Redskins’ decision to draft Kirk Cousins in the 4th round of the NFL Draft. This has been a hot topic lately considering the Redskins traded away three first round picks and one second round pick in order to select Robert Griffin III. He’s expected to be the face of their franchise for the next decade, and with that big of an investment, he needs to succeed. So why would you draft another QB in the same draft?
As for me? I shoveled a lot this winter. I bitched and whined every time I had to call for oil, but dammit, the tank got filled. I only forgot to put the trash out a few times. I did my own taxes. I got flowers. I hired a babysitter a while back, and have gotten to the point where I can say, "Hi. You know the drill. Bye," and I'm out the door. It's worth every f**king penny.
This makes enough to serve 27- we divide it into three gallon sized freezer bags A family of four could make six meals from this recipe.
Love to you all - I have the next blog subject all lined up ready to go, just need some time to do it xxx
I think the art of creating a believable historical or fantasy novel (or in this case both) lies in being able to evoke such a strong sense of time and place that the reader lives and breathes that world as naturally as they do their own. For this reader that is one of the greatest strengths of Gillian Philip's, Firebrand - I could smell the peat and wood smoke, I could inhabit the world so completely I felt the cold, and the earth beneath my feet, and I shared the pain and shed some tears.
We suspect a virus or parasite must have got the young guineas - they are dying at the rate of one a day or every second day. It is too pathetic to watch and there is little we can do. They are impossible to catch while they are well and by the time we can catch them it's too late to do anything. On top of that, they've taken to falling into the pool and I've rescued two in the last two days - dried them off carefully, warmed them up and discovered they smell utterly awful - a sort of sickly sweet, cloying smell that hangs around them - the scent of death, I guess one might say. Their numbers have gone from 13 to four or five in about two weeks. The parents are becoming increasingly twitchy - and who can blame them - and they can't make up their minds if I'm friend or foe. Even Mama Guinea has now taken to trying to attack me - flying straight at me the other day, claws outstretched as I fished a baby from the pool.
"The fabric is from Yellow Bird Fabrics and would be a great, no fantastic sew-up for someone who hasn’t worked with knits before and is ready to give them a try. It’s a perfect knit for the Spring weather I’m dreaming of. And don’t forget, you don’t need a serger to use this pattern or fabric, so definitely enter!"To enter, just leave a comment on A Fashionable Stitch blog and tell Sunni what you’re “sew grateful” for (sewing related). The giveaway is open until Friday, February 9 and anyone, anywhere is welcome to join in.
So, I guess you’d like to know why I’m excited. Well, about a year ago I attended a Winter Jam. During an intermission the audience, including me, was introduced to some of the children needing sponsorship through World Vision. My heart cried out, but at the time there was nothing I could do. It’s one of those things that needs to be discussed with the family. In November, I attended Women of Faith and again we were introduced to more children and again my heart cried out, this time there was an even greater pull, but yet again, there was nothing I could do. This past Thursday, dh and I attended the Third Day concert. He was as far back as I was up front. When Third Day’s tour pastor read off the names of a few of the children and their countries, one called to me more than all the others. I quickly met up with dh. There was very little discussion. In fact, it went something like this–Me: I want to sponsor a child. Him: The one from Jerusalem. (It wasn’t a question, it was go get him.)
i'm so stoked on this thing. it's rad that it's still around and everything about it reminds me of being little. turns out the chooch had the same one growing up, too.
3 Tablespoons Extra Virgin Olive Oil, plus extra for rolls
The hospital is reasonably quiet which I am happy about. Even though something just happened at lunchtime that was a bit off-putting. A guy just all of a sudden jumped up from eating, span himself around and fell on the table screaming. I’m not sure what that was all about! He said he had a dizzy head so am not sure why he has the inclination to jump up, spin around and fall back down again! Anyway, glad that is hopefully over and the guy is OK. I guess this is the kind of stuff that happens in psychiatric hospitals! Pretty used to it after being here for over a year now.
(2) The Crab & Garlic Alfredo Sauce
A pale face, featureless, floated in the doorway, in a hypnotic pattern of afterimages.
Our spring break Georgia blogger meet up is shaping up neatly! If you are a Georgia blogger or blog reader, click here for more information! The more, the merrier!
This recipe is seriously as good as heading to your local indian restaurant, minus the gluten ofcourse.
An Even Easier Way...if you have a Food Processor
But, who does that to someone else?
But he said that humans need to understand what’s going to happen in order to make changes, starting with our own environment. We’re sitting on a time bomb.”
I've got a girls weekend to Las Vegas next month. I am very excited!!!!! My BFF, my mother, and a friend (who is a doula) will all be going. We plan to see Cirque de Soleil Love.
While EUCOM will effect a 15 percent decrease in troop numbers on the continent, that withdrawal will be compensated for with more military aircraft, ships and special operations forces.
According to Horvit’s article, these two men are the second major award winners to do this sort of philanthropic work in the last few years.
But as I thought about what is at the core of Jesus’ message – that our giving, our prayer, and our fasting need to be a matter of the heart that are all done to draw us closer to God and not to gain the praise of men – I realized I’m okay with my blogging. I know that in my heart I blog because the writing draws me closer to God and because it is a way that I can bring the Good News of the Kingdom of God to others.
Dear Tearsa and Tony,
I know - we're all followers of the big trend factory and you can't deny. None of you can. Whether you try to be different or not - we're all somehow influenced by what is going on and what is meant to be so en vogue for the next season. Of course, each of us is trying to be different, crazily seeking for individual style and being creative and all that kind of anti-mainstream-way-of-thinking, that should distinguish you from the broad mass. But at the end of the day, we all try to transform a trend and sometimes it just FAILS. And that's where I'm coming back to this post's topic, where I just can't help myself but to shout out loud that those people with such a pale skin like me should simply STOP presenting themselves in these colours. Leave it out. Go for something different.
I'll let you know when things are final and would love your feedback.
*Embellishments: clear embossing powder; Petaloo flowers; unknown brad covered with Glitter Ritz glitter
In this workshop we will unwind all the abstract wrappings of modern consultancy, management and business practices to reveal what we once had but have now forgotten and look at how best you can add this line of thought to your own approach to narrative.
disc 2
This is the case with the ring shout. Since black people have called dancing in the church “shouting.” It is believed that the word “shout” most likely comes from the Arabic word “shaw’t” meaning circumambulation of the Kaaba. The claim is that since Muslim West Africans couldn’t go to Mecca and walk around the sacred Kaaba site. These Africans created their own ritualistic way of performing the Hajj pilgrimage.
1 plain
I think I'll be a rat..you can call me Black Rat!..and if you don't monkey yourself over there....(points to Pecan Grove) well then Bug and I are going to eradicate you.
This can be difficult to do especially when you are in a crisis but when
Place the bacon around the well, slicing and dicing as you see fit.
3. And finally, you can win the only signed proof copy of Daughter Am I and have fun doing it by going on a treasure hunt. Click here for a chance to win the book: Treasure Hunt!
The Kauravas knew not that they had signed
Sounds intriguing, doesn't it? Born of Blood is the first book, of three, in the Blood Chronicles saga. I can't wait to see how this story continues!
So I'm frightfully envious and jealous of all those writers who have got a shed; and, like Damian, I shall be getting one of my own. Eventually. But the strange thing is that while all these things distract me when I'm supposed to be writing, very often when I'm supposed to be concentrating on the Bits Of My Life That Are Not Writing it's quite easy for me to escape into the Shed in my Head.
Dunedin may not being facing a huge blowout in the cost of the Forsyth Barr Stadium, but it is possible people or organisations may be “brought to account” following an investigation. It emerged on Friday questions remained about the final cost of the stadium – six months after the facility was built.
Our businesses are so much more data driven than they used to be. At the same time, many of us are now a lot more social in the way we do business. These two factors are reason enough to look at the cloud. Using software as a service (SaaS) can increase the efficiency of your communication with others – whether that’s your clients or colleagues.
Before I go, I will leave you with two images. The first one is a sneak peak of how our bathroom is looking at this very moment. Digging the tile? The second, my two favorite boys. Mattingly is a constant fixture at the bathroom door while we work. I think he's over the renovation. He's one good looking dog...and the hubs isn't so bad himself!
Topic.
"Your feeling is wrong. I feel that we're the right one."
“*cough*jesuschristislord*cough*”
Everyone should have at least one friend who vigorously resists contemporary modes of communication, yet remains connected in profound and genuine ways. For me, that friend is Declan Kiberd, professor of English at University College Dublin. He doesn't have email, certainly doesn't twitter, and (according to his daughter Amy) "will NEVER submit to a mobile!" Phone, that is. I think he writes his many books in a longhand scrawl, covering legal pads with carefully formulated observations. If you write him a letter, and send it by post, he just might write back – if you have something meaningful to say. The entire world seems to interest him.
Being Postmaster isn't all golden suits and wingéd hats. First, Von Lipwig must prove himself to the Post Office Workers, then he finds himself in direct competition with the Grand Trunk Semaphore Company, a telecommunications conglomerate that's "too big to fail." (Which begs the question, does Pratchett possess some weird sixth sense or does Tim Geithner read Terry Pratchett?)
The most recent event of sufficient interest to warrant Billmon's comment was how Eric Cantor's responded to violent acts and threats against Democrats by saying, well who knows what the hell he said, it was complete gibberish.
“As Jesus was walking beside the Sea of Galilee, he saw two brothers, Simon called Peter and his brother Andrew. They were casting a net into the lake, for they were fishermen.
Pooling and sharing military resources under NATO’s so-called Smart Defense program to further integrate respective national capabilities into a supranational NATO structure also include the alliance’s over eight-year-old Baltic Air Policing mission which deploys warplanes from major NATO member states to skirt the borders of northwestern Russia.
Spread out chicken on pizza
On the northern half of the table the German Recon battalion is being hard pressed against the Air-Landing Regiment (see below). Another battalion attack on a company strength defense of a wood. Again note another suppressed German platoon lagging to the rear.
One of the most colorful of the Bremonds was Eugene’s son Pierre. His wife, Nina Louise Abadie, was an athletic and beautiful young socialite from St. Louis, and was fond of swimming, cycling, dancing, and tennis. During her youth she went ice skating on a lake and fell through some thin ice, and was saved from drowning by George Chopin, young son of Kate Chopin, the novelist who wrote “The Awakening.”
The struggle is about doing what we can to make the lives of those who come after us better than ours. I will be thoroughly enjoying some free time to spend with my family and friends, away from television and intrusive technology. What is the point in struggle if we don't take the time to be with our loved ones? As the Police State grows, we may find ourselves spirited away by the Thought Police under Nacht und Nebel type settings. As we continue to fight the evil in our midst, it is troubling to think of how far our enemies are willing to go to silence us. We must ensure that every moment counts and that should we be removed by any means, that our struggle continues and our loved ones understand our sacrifice.
Now Santa Claus comes forward,
Working on a research project in Northern Afghanistan in August last year, I met some insurgents who were not ethnic Pashtuns, but Turkmens. They told me they were paid $500 to $600 a month by a Taliban commander in Mazar-e-Sharif. That is more than what some of my colleagues were being paid by an NGO. Some of the Taliban men are opportunists who benefit from the narcotics industry and seek Taliban’s shelter.
meet my little coin purses.......
How about you? Do you see yourself with a lot of different hats, or from time to time having to put on your “business” face, or “social” face? While it is probably okay to do that, what is not okay is not being able to admit it. Even worse, it can become ruinous to not even recognize it.
Favorite New TV Drama
As Deleuze and Guattari have it in A Thousand Plateaus, it is the difference between a map and a tracing. A map offers many routes through; but a tracing only offers one. In this sense, the old AtoZ books offer a multitude of routes, but the SatNav only shows you one way: the supposedly more efficient, more direct route. It gets confused if you veer off course, however, and go exploring through the back streets and back routes; or decide you're not going there after all.
II. Material and Formal Requirements for an Application As a consequence of the CJEU decision in Case C-322/10 Medeva, for the first time it is possible to file an application for an SPC for a product which is different from the product for which the underlying Marketing Authorisation has been granted. The court decided there that an SPC can be granted for a combination of two compounds, if a Marketing Authorisation is presented which has been granted for more than two compounds. Subsequently Case C 422/10 Georgetown University clarified that an SPC can be granted even for one single compound if a Marketing Authorisation is presented which is directed to more than one compound. The term “specified” used in this decision caused further discussion regarding the questions, how the product of an SPC has to be defined in the basic patent. However, it is very likely that this issue will be the subject matter of a further Referral to the CJEU. Moreover, the special case of passive certificates, i.e. certificates based on third parties Marketing Authorisations, was discussed (Article 6,
Be sure to check out the Cartoon Network website and sign up for a free account. You will be able to play fun games, find out when your favorite Cartoon Network shows air, go shopping on the Cartoon Network Shop, and much more!
But now I'm back.
Woman & Home magazine are doing a feature on the pub in the July edition but it will be on sale at the end of May, so pick
Speaking of Tangerine Tango...it's this week's Friday's Fancies theme. When I went to find some inspiration to create an outfit, I saw this beauty on Pinterest and thought it was perfect. Why recreate something when the look I love is right here?!?! I adore the aqua pops of color with it!
Anywho, a couple of those boards are dedicated to foody goodness that I have enjoyed sampling. Some have come out tantalizing, others not so much.
10:00 am
What many of the books described in this post have in common—aside from their shared interest in what a climatically different earth will mean for the future of human civilization—is their use of short, fictionalized narratives set in specific future years or geographic regions as a way of illustrating larger points.
So I'm sitting here, trying to finally write that dam post about how my my dogs last vet visit went (fuck writing that, the new vet was awesome, confirmed dog had a pull tendon and also a bad ear infection. Had to chase dog for thirty minutes next day trying to collect his piss for a urine sample. Hilarity ensued) , and all of a sudden my couch starts to shake a little bit. Not a whole lot, but enough to make me stop and think if it was the couch shaking or if Dreamer had spiked my soda with vodka before he left and I was just feeling it now. Now at first, I thought it might have been my landlord possibly doing some work outside since he supposed to be fixing some stuff. I go upstairs and I find out that it was an earthquake in Virginia. An average of about 5.9. I know it's a bit of a big deal since we're about 300 miles away, but since the only major thing that happened to us being the chandelier in the living room shaking half a Millimeter I really didn't give a dam.
This is just madness, we are laying the ground for our own extinction. Did nobody see that documentary* Rise of the Planet of the Apes, this is where it starts.
and on
On the day of Post-it's adventure (if it wasn't all a bad dream), he was sleeping peacefully on the end of a roll of plastic that seemed something like a tree. It was growing out of a small pond surrounded by plastic. The pond was in a dark, damp building which made it pretty safe, under most conditions. Post-it later regretted that he had felt too lazy to change his colors so that he blended in better.
7. It's popularity has spawned a series of other vampire centric novels, and TV shows (e.g. House of Night, True Blood, amongst many others). Though some are quite good, pretty soon we're gonna get bored.
We apologise for the inconvenience caused in the delivery of your package to Ghana. We are, however, under pressure from the Gambia government not to release this package without having the following details from the recipient
I’m sure there are many things I’ll never learn by traveling over the earth in a canoe. I’m just not sure any of them are worth much. - Douglas Woods, Paddle Whispers
Lost Coast Brewery
9.) French knots
Each raw pantry will be unique, tailored to your own individual tastes and dietary requirements. Of course, there was no need to run out and buy everything listed right away. I simply purchased a new ingredient as needed for recipes I was trying:) Many of the items were purchased in the bulk section of my co-op.
A delegation of the World Federation of Democratic Youth (WFDY) and the World Peace Council (WPC) and visited the injured army members at Tishreen Military Hospital in Damascus.
Others
Enjoy your Saturday night!!
1) The will of God is not sin or living a lifestyle of sin.
Many years ago in my twenties I attended a retreat in which I was considerably younger that most attendees. The focus, as the retreat developed, was primarily on the changes in the faith lives of those aging and getting closer to completing the race. At the time, I felt the entire event was a bit tiresome. After all, I was young -- I had my whole life ahead of me! I recall the elderly priest saying, "I am at a point when I am asking what to do in my faith life when all the things I hung my hat on no longer fill me with contentment and peace." I felt sorry for the old fellow, and for the men listening who slowly nodded in agreement. Yet even now I consider the words he spoke: "As I near the finish line I still can't see it clearly, and it worries me." Indeed.
Author, “A Teen’s Guide to Going Vegetarian”, former editor: Vegetarian Times
Julie-The Mom Life. Teaching Spanish. Cutting out classes for next semester. Working about 10 hours a week. Needs some friends. Still couponing. Felt. Christmas presents. Needs some friends. Needs a gym. The Mom Life.
The scrub I received is scented with ‘Lime & Ginger’, and smells absolutely lovely. What I adore about Betty Buff’s products is that they’re based on vintage, tried and tested recipes and contain no parabens or icky chemical fragrances, just simple ingredients which do the job just as well, if not better, than the scrubs you can buy in shops. The ingredients in Gunky Monkey are listed as: Sugar, Vegetable Oil, Evening Primrose Oil, Glycerin, Honey, Lime and Ginger – all good stuff! And it looks like this…
Eldest amongst her five siblings, Ma was born in an average middle class family of educationists. She spent her early years in Theosophical Society Banaras. Her parents supported her in pursuing higher education. She had a very sound cultural background and always mentioned that she was fortunate to have been born and brought up in that time and place.
carrying a knife, a camera
lost in the mouths of lilied frogs
If you would like to share your stories about Ebbets, e-mail exlab@brooklynhistory.org with the subject line “Ebbets Field Story” or call (718) 222-4111 x241. Interviews will be scheduled on March 23 and March 25 and will take 30 minutes; no walk-ins will be accepted. Contact BHS by March 15 to make an appointment.
*With Zosia Mamet taking a regular role in HBO’s Girls, will that do anything for her availability for Mad Men? Maybe not, given Alison Brie’s dual jobs here and on Community but it perhaps bears watching.
As far as the soles go, you’ll want leather. The traction isn’t the best but there’s another staple we’ll talk about for bad-weather footwear on rainy or snowy days.
Sorry I've been MIA for so long. Miss you all!
lion or piece of purple cloth
I don't recall seeing signs that read, "New company policy: We are not buying any overpriced gasoline until Bush is gone."
I can understand why the Mexican and other mestizo immigrants (both quasi-legal and the illegal aliens) want an evermore tolerant, deracinated, and racially weakened White population. It’s not very difficult to see what’s in it for them:
V is for Vegetable you love: snow pea leaves, sugar snap peas, chinese bitter melon, and other strange asian veggies
In most cases being left-handed is a matter of heredity... it must be passed down to you by your parents genes, however there is some evidence to show that people with neurological differences tend to be left-handed. People with Down syndrome would fit into that category.
My tears were genuine as the white coffin disappeared behind thick blue curtains. I felt shame. I had lost a friend to guilty lust for the first time in hundreds of years; it was why I stopped playing with girls in the first place. My answer to Liz’s final question – had I taken the time to reply instead of fucking and biting her to death – would have been “Yes. Girls – the living, I want you
The vice on my head loosened after a few seconds, the pain abating as though nothing happened. It felt like brain freeze only a gazillion times worse. These nuclear-fueled migraines had been plaguing me for weeks. I was pretty sure they weren't growing pains unless my head planned to expand to grotesque proportions. A rush of endorphins tingled through my body in an electric rush as the agony completely dissipated and left me lightheaded and weak.
01:30 – 02:00 Digital Punk Live
And watch your life
In this midst of this calamity, Kṛṣṇa also visited Yudhiṣṭhira and ate a small morsel that was still left in the cooking pot. He felt great satisfaction. Because Godhead is the root from which all other souls are branches, when he felt full, Durvāsa and all the sages also felt completely full and did not return to Yudhiṣṭhira after taking their baths in the nearby river..
Yeah, that sounds safe. Well, a heck of a Friday evening, if nothing else.
23. One summer afternoon Mrs. Oedipa Maas came home from a Tupperware party whose hostess had put perhaps too much kirsch in the fondue to find that she, Oedipa, had been named executor, or she supposed executrix, of the estate of one Pierce Inverarity, a California real estate mogul who had once lost two million dollars in his spare time but still had assets numerous and tangled enough to make the job of sorting it all out more than honorary. —Thomas Pynchon, The Crying of Lot 49 (1966)
So not only would we face the grouping penalty (how different from EverQuest where there is a grouping bonus) but there seemed little chance that we would run into anything challenging. Azeroth seems to be a very nice shared single-player experience these days, with no barriers to the solo player but little incentive to group.
Bob is a professional marketing consultant skilled in all areas of strategic planning and execution. Adept at managing complex endeavors within organizations of all sizes, Bob works closely with clients to offer strategic counsel on a range of key marketing initiatives. With over 15 years of experience in developing strategies in print, direct mail, promotional products and apparel. Bob has worked with organizations such as Basic Rights Oregon, OMSI, Planned Parenthood, Cascade Aids Project, Human Rights Campaign and several others. He has held several community Board positions as well as started several networking groups.
Stonehenge
Datawind received order of 14 lakhs Aakash units in first 14 days. Sadly, the Aakash didn’t arrive in 2011.
Today we present a lovely example of the genre. It's called The Copywriter Is Dead. It appeared last week in a blog called The Future Of Media. According to this latest addition to the Encyclopedia Of Things That Are Dead, we copywriters have "perfected the art of lying to consumers" and for that and our other sins we have now been exiled to the boneyard.
N- inserts next, a reminder that this supposed ‘truth’ that people seem to pursue so doggedly, might be dangerous. ‘Nobody is very likely to consider a doctrine true merely because it makes people happy…But people like to forget that making unhappy…is no counterargument. Something might be true while being harmful and dangerous…Indeed it might be a basic characteristic of existence that those who would know it completely would perish…’ This argument again tries to drive home the point that ‘truth worship’ is not likely an end in itself. N- asks the dogmatist, “Would you still want the truth if possession of it ended your life?” Short of this, he remarks, ‘In which case the strength of a spirit should be measured according to how much of the “truth” one could still barely endure…to what degree one would require it to be thinned down, shrouded, sweetened, blunted, falsified.’ N- says, if you want to say you value truth above all, you have to value truth above life, and he sees this as an absurd position, and points out that the best position a dogmatist (who relishes not an obscure martyrdom) is figuring out how best to lie; how to give the ‘best falsification’, in which case they ‘descend’ into the realm of argument and interpretation with the rest of us. What would they say to this?
It was all about how this game, "monsters and mazes" (think Dungeons and Dragons) corrupted these kids, and one went insane and almost killed himself. We play Dungeons and Dragons, and we've never gone crazy. ROFL! I told the boys that the moral of the story is to just not go Crazy. Not that D&D is bad. Or computer games. Or video games. Or guns. Same concept. It's not the tool that is bad, it's how it's used. Things can be used for good or for "evil". It's all a personal choice. So, if nothing else, it was a good "conversation starter" with the kids.
Topper (US…Norman Z.McLeod)
Have a wonderful week and a great Thanksgiving. I know this is quite a weight off of my family’s shoulders to have the house on the market.
Step carefully, Roger. Uncle Rupie only hired you, because he thinks you’re hot and good for ratings.
I do intend to get back on track! In fact, let me know (either in comments or a email) if you have any topics you’d like to hear about. Otherwise, expect new posts sometime in the coming weeks (definitely before Christmas).
Check the post below to see the Random.org Top 3!
towards spring's silver threaded light
There are a number of ways to sell your craft: Etsy, Ebay, craigslist, Facebook, word of mouth, etc.
08 Let Me See The Colts 06:35
But as soon as these people (aka “they” aka these 2 face actors/actresses/producers/directors rolling in that mula power and soooo not in the hood. Who’ll pull out guns everywhere like there’s no such thing as police, it’s bad enough the po po target us and shoot us for using our cell phones. They’ll quickly showcase little tini-bopper girls who’s bussin’ slugs at pretty much everyone in sight (according to this very trailer), and then some, no problem at all? Just a point, hope you got it, so get it. I would have NEVER posted this filth if there was NO REAL message involved on my side of course. You think I’m over reacting? Lemme know!
I was at our local library talking to the volunteer coordinator about my volunteer application. She looked at it and turned to me and said, ’We need a few library grandparents, would you be interested in something like that?’
It's the last day of the Superlative Blog fest *cries*
~Jenny
If you are new to my blog, thanks for stopping by. Here's what we are doing... I give you a word, you give me a sentence containing that word to add on to our story. If you would like more of an explanation, please read this POST.
I think about how much time is wasted in trying to get people to take responsibility and acknowledge that improvements must be made. Everyone thinks they are immune. It is always someone else’s fault. I worry for the day when I will be expected to step to the plate and manage – I have staved it off for a while, turning down promotions. But I know it is inevitably around the corner. And I hope, that I will have the guts to own it all, lock stock and barrel. The successes and the failures. It is easy to take credit for successes; harder to take credit for the failures. But if you can’t; then management shouldn’t be your profession. But I truly feel that it boils down to integrity. When the chips are down, you either have integrity or you don’t. I am usually not so black and white with my opinions; but when it comes to core values: honesty, integrity, etc. I feel there is no gray area. No one is perfect; but that being said, If you are willing to own up to your shortcomings, people are more willing to forgive and move on instead of wanting to crucify someone. If you own to your mistakes – no one can take away your integrity. They may take your job; but they can’t away your integrity – and there will always be another job if you’ve acted with integrity. This is part of the reason I have not taken on a management position. I want to be the kind of person who would be willing to resign should the failure be mine. To be honest, I am not willing to at this point in my life, my family relies to heavily on my income. So I turn down promotions (job security over career growth). But I still believe in integrity and honesty and will always tell the truth and own to my mistakes no matter the consequences, the difference is that I don’t wait until a major failure happens to do it.
9 cast
Very welcome to this Uplifting Blog,
’But we have to get off here,’ said Kaoru, sadly. ‘This is where you get off to go to Heaven.’
This is my name for the Delirium Tremens clone AHS recipe. I had one that hit, one that missed and I'm trying to recreate the greatness of the one that hit. Things are changing a bit though. The hop shortage meant that I substituted Fuggle for the Styrian Goldings and I used Saaz Sladek rather than the Trschitz type. That may add a touch more bitterness. AHS was also out of extra pale extract. Instead of the 8 lbs. of liquid malt extract, I took 7 lbs. of dry malt extract (DME). I have been using late addition for any of the lighter colored brews and I tried with this one too. I put 2 lbs. of the DME in with the 1 1/2 lbs. clear candi at the start and added the last 5 lbs. of DME after the boil. The DME is interesting to get stirred in correctly. I had lumps to work down. In the end I had a wort with an O.G. of 1.098 - much more than the 1.085 the recipe expects. I did leave this a bit more concentrated in the primary to give more head space. The previous two versions blew the lid a couple times. I set up my blow off tube expecting that the foam would spill through the tube into the bucket. Not so. It did give good bits of bubbles for a couple days, but then settled down. I don't have temp. control in my brew closet, but it has been a bit on the colder side these days. I might expect that the average temp is 67F or 68F. Still reminds me that my next beer project is to get another freezer for temp control on fermentation. Still, checking the beer through the airlock hole, I can see that the foam still completely covers the top. I think the yeasties are still happy and working. I'll have to wait a week, maybe two, until I rack it off to a carboy. I fully expect this one to sit for 3-4 months. I'm wondering if I have to wait longer. This beer has the potential of 13%.
10 - Dreams I'll Never See 07:05
I admire so much several writers who write for that website I don't want to speak of, that I feel I cannot speak of anymore (those who elevate in general the discourse over there and the discourse of contemporary literature, like Chris Higgs, Adam Jameson, Roxane, other recent writers). But I cannot go there anymore. It is ugly. It is a toxic space. It is not a safe space.
Micah Richards absolutely bossed the right wing, forward and back, forward and back. Naturally, the murmur of machines stitching his England Number 2 shirt for the Euros could be heard in the distance.
Yeah, sorry about that.
2) I am not following the latest songs which I used to.. now only singing Nursery Rhymes
Everything seemed to add up.
I’ve had my portrait taken by another photographer twice, as he was engaged by my university for marketing purposes. In both cases he’s made disparaging comments about my weight and generally made me feel unattractive, not necessarily a great way to make your clients feel comfortable. And guess what? The photos suck. If you can’t make your subject feel beautiful then you shouldn’t take photos (in the portrait sense). And taking pictures of models doesn’t count.
Now, I’ve decided that we big kids too shall make impossibly-bright-colored wind socks.
What’s even more amazing is that this is not a group that someone would say logically goes together. The age range is from mid-20’s to late 60’s. Some are married. Some are single. Some have young children. Some have grandchildren. Some are trying to have children. Some work. Some don’t.
Frenzy follows the killer as he plies his deadly trade all over town, and even leads police to pursue and arrest an innocent man for his crimes. The murder scene alone, and I mean alone as it was so effective that it was the only actual murder shown in the film, rates this as a definite horror movie.
for 31 days
A variety of useful ideas are presented, encouraging me (and hopefully you) to put these ideas in use and make our homes a place we can enjoy. This is not a strict “do it this one way” guide. The author presents a variety of ideas, allowing you to implement the one that fits you. I love it!
And, I’m glad I did.
We have been having quite a few play dates lately and enjoying Nanny's maternity leave.
The Board noted that, if there are heirs or successors to the name, they may institute an opposition or cancellation proceeding. Moreover, a Section 2(a) claim is not time-barred under Section 14 of the Trademark Act.
If you go down to the woods* today
Here's a gusset. At the point I should have photo-shopped the dot in. It's 1/4" from each side seam, at the point, but here you can't see it.
Gene Simmons
source:b4u
Everywhere there is the sound of running water and falling droplets. In the distance I can hear sea gulls laughing. These last two weeks there have been birds everywhere. Snow sparrows have appeared, little black and white birds which flit around in groups, and there seems to have been an increase in eagles. All types of water fowl have appeared in the fjord, including some mallard ducks of the kind I used to feed as a child in Swindon's Queen's Park. In the fjord last week we saw either some kind of small dolphins or very large fish which kept breaking the surface of the water around sunset. There was also a theory that they might have been otters, because our neighbours have seen an otter making its way through our garden. So I guess I'm not much of a naturalist if all I can tell you is "there was something down there in the water," but it was quite a sight and that night I dreamt of porpoise and otters the size of sea lions.
We think that the split should lean more in our favor. Mr. Huang is unlikely to find another von Niederhoffentanger any time soon.
Yesterday Mr Justice Kitchin (Chancery Division, England and Wales) ordered an April 2010 trial on the basis that there was sufficient evidence to believe that Asda’s campaign could threaten Specsavers’ reputation to bring the trial forward. Specsavers’ had argued that it should be held as early as January. Hugh Cuddigan (counsel for Asda) is however reported as having informed the court that its solicitors (Pinsent Masons) would need additional time to prepare their client's defence since they would be stacking supermarket shelves over Christmas. Apparently a Pinsent Masons team has agreed to work for Asda free of charge for three days during the Christmas period in order to understand its business better. Asda also preferred the later date because its lawyers planned to conduct a wide-ranging survey of Asda shoppers to determine whether they had been misled by its advertising. The IPKat interjects at this point that the Pinsent Masons website, which makes no apparent reference to this item at the time this article was posted, leads with the impressive banner "Welcome to Pinsent Masons: the Global 100 law firm that's working hard to make it easier for clients". Indeed it is.
Thanks, Vanessa, for the inspiration!
And never will it change.
This is the part where you're expecting to hear how much that sucked......
Spoon into tortillas, add toppings and serve!
Oh the folks on this plane are frightful
(4) I have a small but important disciplinary quibble with Halperin. Early in his essay, he mentions in passing the importance of social psychology in undermining the normalizing effect of psychological discourses, but then ignores the social psychological research into gay men throughout his essay. In the sociological side of social psych, particularly in the symbolic interactionist tradition, researchers and theorists have been working out interactionist models of abjection and subordinated subjectivities for decades. Many of Halperin’s conclusions in the essay were arrived at by symbolic interactionists as early as the 1962 in Goffman’s Stigma. I do not wish to undermine or devalue Halperin’s contributions here; but rather to point to a much-needed dialogue between queer theory and the symbolic interactionist literature, especially about socially “spoiled” individuals (i.e., subordinate) and their strategies of negotiating social spaces of inferiority and abjection. I think such intellectual cross-fertilization can only enrich queer theorization. That said, as a dyed-in-the-wool interactionist myself, I’m fully aware that I have a vested interest in such a dialogue, so my critique is not neutral.
When you look at the pictures of the house, you will see that the lady does the decorating in stages. On Tuesday, she didn't have everything out. Hope you enjoy seeing the pictures.
First test on tap was the photo test and it passed with flying colors! Excellent detailed photos with this ink. It was dry when the photo came out and was thoroughly impressed with photo results. Still lab quality like the OEM Epson inks.
In print editions, alternative story forms tend to be more engaging to readers than blocks of text. For Web sites, alternative story forms can take engagement to the next level by creating opportunities for reader interactivity, like clicking on a map, viewing a slideshow or taking a quiz.
First, let us all accept that stress is a part of life today and instead of battling it, embrace it and then, confront it. You may ask, how?
Kovakka/Tindora/Ivygourd - 250 gms
In honor of St. Patrick's Day, the ingredients had to include potatoes and cabbage. Colcannon is a traditional Irish dish made of potatoes and cabbage or kale. So I split these main ingredients into two separate dishes. First I sauteed the okra with garlic, scallions, crushed red pepper and corn. A delicious combination. Meanwhile, I prepared a pot of cheezy mashed potatoes. Then I combined them to create cheezy potato-okra corn cakes that I dusted in seasoned corn meal and pan-fried. They were crispy on the outside, creamy and tender on the inside.
Overpopulation had made a relatively comfortable situation untenable.
5:00pm – Youth Rugby Challenge; Kahuku Red Raiders, HA v Belmont Shore, CA
I'm sure many teenagers of the period annoyed many an art teacher, mine included, with endless 2000ad and sci-fi inspired opuses, many of which would probably get us sent to school psychologists in these current times, but we didn't have those then so we got to draw. I distinctly remember one project where there was some quote about a circus and something behind a curtain and I more or less drew the below, from a Megazine story called the Black Widow, with an almost unrecognizable curtain as a border around it.
Memo to Congresswoman DeLauro and friends: Those days are over.
Usually, we have our test in October and we meet up with dozens of homeschooling families from all over the county and the kids have a fun time visiting and accomplish a state requirement at the same time. But last October, Isabelle had two teeth pulled the day before the test. Truly, she was quite the trooper and handled the procedure and the aftermath with a grace and patience which belied her age. But there was no way I was asking the girl to sacrifice two teeth and then take a test. That would just be evil.
We want to get to the point where, when we have a strong feeling about something, we really know whether it’s the ego at work or whether it is a deeper, more authentic part of our self. We want to get to the point where we are quite familiar with these different dimensions of the self so that we can make the right choices, consistently.
lawn turned green ... seemingly overnight. You
I’ve had conversations with a growing number of Christians who share this sentiment. It’s seemed particularly strong in the last year, with the latest Presidential election. Over the last four years my world view has drastically changed, and I’ve seen many of my brothers and sisters change as well. (I’ve touched on this new and ever-changing world view in previous blogs. See “Anarchism and Ecclesiastes” and “A Mainstream Counterculture”)
Not so with a newborn. Kate is just beginning to adjust to her surroundings and while we know she’ll be alive-and-kicking from 8pm-11pm, she may also be fussy at completely random times of day. Kelly is handling this marvelously well, while I’m just trying to avoid making Kate cry.
Not your wrath Mother Earth!
"I'm painting a miral now!" - Eliza
So a brief wrap-up to a long story, with all the cyber stalking you’re doing don’t forget to check up on yourself once in a while. Social Media networks and video sites are great places to put content to brand yourself and control your reputation in the digital space. Remember Google loves things owned by, well, Google. So when crafting your web presence think YouTube, Google Plus, and Places pages. Facebook is a also as heavy hitter when it comes to personal search results.
Tests- 132, Wickets- 619, Avg- 29.65, 5W- 35, Best- 10/74
This is acting so weird that I’m going to go ahead and post this before it locks up and I lose the whole thing. Don’t know why it is acting the way that it is but it is making me nuts.
MUST-HEARS: “Hold On”, “Heartbreaker”, “Hang Loose”, “I Found You”
Filled with romance and adventure, Awaken takes your through a labyrinth of situations, every corner asking you if we're leaving our real lives behind when we enter the cyber-world.
What an extraordinary autumn we are having here in Southwest Nova – really warm weather and an extended season for the foraging honeybees. If bees wore clothing they would be dressed in shorts and tank tops with these temperatures. But despite what our eyes see, the phenology of bees- to- flora is telling another story. It is saying that the flower sources for the nectar and pollen are getting low and the beehive is in preparations for winter.
Do you feel like a ghost of your former self?
Morning has broken, like the first morning.
I’m not going to quote When Harry Met Sally; it’s out-dated. Have you seen Meg Ryan lately? So listen up: if you try to be friends with a guy, one of you will end up wanting the other. The only exception is if he knew you in/before high school. In other words, before your nose job or dental braces.
She’s not sure how to say it, so she just says it “Uhh… How did you turn those two men to Ice?” she questions.
She seemed to let him have his thoughts. She walked calmly and patiently as if waiting for a ‘yes’ or a ‘no’.
7) Barrington Gold Espresso
LINE 10 muffin cups with paper liners
There are many ways to handle this sort of thing, but I just can’t bring myself to pretend that I know what I’m talking about. I’ve done that in the past and I always feel guilty about it. Once, in elementary school, I had a guy convinced that I had been to see the Mortal Combat movie and he asked me very particular questions about the characters, of which I only had a cursory understanding. Needless to say, I hadn’t seen the movie. Regardless, I was able to bluff my way through the conversation and win the boy’s respect. Was it worth it? No. Do I still cringe thinking about it? Yes.
The poem quoted is part of a larger work that Tennyson wrote to process the death of his dear friend, Arthur Hallam. Intellectually, he believes that all things work together for good, that every tragedy has a reason, but despite his rational belief, he doesn't quite get it. He's like a baby crying in the dark (though, as a mother, I'm going to take a wild guess that the baby's not crying for the light, he's crying for his mother!) who doesn't understand what's going on. It's an uncertain poem, stating a moral but then casting doubt on it at the end -- saying, "Yes, I do believe this, but when the rubber hits the road this consolation does not really satisfy me." I like the honesty of it.
*Unconditonal love
Buffalo chicken anything seems to be huge right now. I'm loving it because I have always been a huge fan of buffalo chicken. I can't open a bag of buffalo chicken pretzel crips without devouring the whole bag. Whoops.
When the rice is the desired texture, remove the pan from the heat and stir in the cheese, plus salt and pepper to taste. Truffle salt really complements the sunchoke flavor, if you have it around.
The total caloric intake from soy in the Chinese diet is only 1.5%. Modern soy doesn’t resemble traditional Asian soy in any way. And to make matters worse, soy has become one of the biggest genetically modified crops in the world, with most (over 90%) of it being GMO. So, now we have all this soy milk, most of which is not organic, going into our babies, and our general population, who all believe it is healthy; all because of marketing.
Allegheny has some very interesting alums, including lawyer Clarence Darrow, President William McKinley, and Trent Reznor of Nine Inch Nails (who dropped out after a year and moved to Cleveland to pursue a musical career).
Before you wonder, yes. I am different. :) I do like my Left for Dead video games, Resident Evil games and movies, Dawn of the Dead (and certainly more so, Shaun of the Dead) etc., but, not unnaturally so. In fact, my absolute favorite book of all time is Wuthering Heights. So, yes. I am odd. But no. That is not why I loved this book. The structure of the story was down-right brilliant. True, there was some off-color, kind of.....yucky moments the main character reflects back on. Rather, there was some vulgar terminology, but that too, enriched the story; not the terminology itself, but the use of it, allowed us to see the difference in thought process between Professor Jack Barnes and Zombie Jack Barnes, This book is definitely a "hit or miss" story, particularly because of how it was told. But, with me, it was a home run. I found myself laughing out loud several times, holding my breath, gasping, and craving more Brains, much as is the point of the story. I highly recommend to every adult who is not too squeamish and not afraid when an author sometimes has to get down and dirty. :) I rate this a 1, Pay Full Price Guilt Free! I can't wait to see what Ms. Becker has up her sleeves, as we speak.
harassment by the state law enforcement, essentially robbing them of a
Baby G is on a schedule now. A solid one that doesn’t change much. But before you get excited, here’s the schedule:
Detail...There are times as I write that I am so anxious to get the story typed out that I don't slow down enough to paint the picture for the reader. My editor helped me with this process tremendously and although I know exactly what I mean, I completely understand the environments I am writing about. I know what everything looks like...I have to remember the reader doesn't. So I have to find the right balance of giving enough information to help them experience the moment without burying them in too much detail.
She will fight this with everything she has, she is truly a strong and positive person.
So we are amending things for 2012, certainly for the first few months, we will be going to bi-weekly giving both entrants and team members two weeks for each challenge.
The "storm of the century" ended up being a lot less of a "thing" than anticipated (luckily!). It got really dark and broody around 4pm and then the already-insane winds picked up, the rain rolled in and the hail started falling. We just woke Toby up from his nap and were about to make a break for the basement (the entrance is outside) but then all of a sudden the clouds parted and all was well again. Hopefully everyone stayed safe!
I collected all my supplies, even organized my buttons on my canvas and then I froze. I just could not figure out what to do with the background. Paint it? What colour? Mod Podge? Fabric or paper? It was so silly but I just could not visualize how this silly little craft would look in the end. I always have to see something in my mind before I can make it happen.
The match, for those who care, did not finish very well (for Saracens) with a Harlequins win, but with a consolation prize of a world record it’s difficult to complain. And elsewhere, once I have my software sorted, I will be happier taking and processing rugby photos. I hope.
So? Are you ready to see the first room's makeover? I call this. . . "The Luggage Room". Kids call it "The Treasure Chest Room". I like that one, too.
The idea that the moving terrain of a glacial ice sheet could be considered a stable-enough launching point for nuclear missiles is astonishing, and the idea that the U.S. Army once ran a top secret, and rather Metallica-sounding, "city under ice" just shy of the North Pole only adds to the story's disarming surreality.
Place the cider, orange and pineapple juice in a large kettle or pot. Add the ginger, cinnamon and stir in the honey. Add the apple and orange slices. Stud the whole orange with the cloves and place in the kettle.
Anyhoo, over the last few years, ever since I was old enough to buy my own clothes, I have realized that part of making your wardrobe investments worthwhile is learning how to take care of your prized possessions. People write about investing in quality and choosing well-fitting clothes but no one really talks about how to make those purchases last such that your cost per wear actually amounts to something. It surprises me that most people don't really know or care about the right way to treat their clothes e.g. hanging heavy sweaters, not using shoe trees or dry cleaning cashmere etc.
JD: “I saw him, but it was too late because I was catatonic. He poisoned me?”
The bow really makes this blouse special and is what first caught my attention. I wanted a more floppy look, so I did not interface the bias cut piece. That process has always confused me. What exactly is the point of cutting something on the bias if you intend to use interfacing?
Remember, if you didn't win you can use the $10 discount on the purchase of the My Memories Suite and a $10 coupon for the My Memories store. That's a $20 value and just in time for Christmas! This is the perfect Christmas gift for your favorite crafter.
The music faltered, the Cadillac stalled and the air became hotter and heavier with each passing second of silence. The man slowly turned his head to face Benny. The air was so dense it blocked Benny’s sweat from exiting his pores.
*The power is on, but we're told the grid is very fragile right now and we should conserve power to prevent black outs.
You can see my necklace a little better here. I made my bouquet myself from flowers from Kroger. Not bad for $35, huh?
If you don't have a blog that's fine just become a follower and then leave your name with Inlinkz skipping the URL bit...
This time Simon says he would love to welcome back the Girls Aloud star on the judging panel.
In the UK it was reported in 1992 that in the first 25 years of the operation of the Abortion Act 1967 only 0.013% of all abortions were performed 'to save the life of the mother' and it is even questionable whether many of these required such radical action. The 2009 Abortion Statistics for England and Wales do not record any on these grounds.
DLX ATX
With police not responding to tip-offs – despite a national crime line initiative – residents fed up with crime say they are left with no option but to take the law into their hands.
Four Places You Have Lived
62. Create a scrapbook
"They can't do it!" Deanna shouts, "We are being persecuted."
It's funny really: my own tastes musically have diversified to the point of insanity over the last 10-15 years, but this band remains, for me, the kind of childhood remnant you just can't shake because your very ears seem attuned to their special brand of jangly sunshine. Can't wait to hear what they do next!
that’s how I’m bound to you
“Deal!” I shouted, with my mouth against the door.
The Secret of Giving ... GMC ... 11 PM
Anyways, it's weekend now and I have a loads of shots to edit, and lots of studying on my agenda.
So I have this plan which I hesitate to share because I'm afraid that the minute I share it I will run out of ideas. Many of you have shared that it feels incredibly overwhelming to tackle a whole house and that you would prefer to tackle one room or even 1 drawer at a time. I shared here 6 tips that will help you maintain a tidy house on a weekly basis.
“well, look on the bright side….”
If you are planning to buy a power tool, you have the choice between buying a corded or cordless tool. Well, the first option that most of us would choose is cordless. Reason being, there are many immediate benefits of having a cordless power tool.
This marvellous Victorian promotional handbill (flyer) from London addresses the discerning working man in need of new clothing. Written in a presumably authentic slang current at the time, it has an immediacy and humour that defies its age, even though much of it is completely mystifying to the modern reader.
This is the beautiful 'Boobie Love' Available here, I can't help but colour her up time and time again. Once again I would like to thank Krista Smith for giving her away to us all!
I got up at the buttcrack of dawn to tend to Mom before starting Day 3 of my new job. I arrived to find a gargantuan mess. Her bed was wet and soiled, she was wet and soiled, the floors were wet and soiled. I set water running, and stepped out of my sweater and blouse, to keep from making a mess of my own clothes, and got Mom into the shower. I settled her in warm jammies with a cup of tea, then stripped beds, started laundry, washed floors, cleaned carpets. Then I raced out the door to try to get to work on time.
I just wish my expectations hadn't been raised so high. Instead of being surprisingly good, it was about as good as I expected. No complaints, though--without the raised expectations I probably would've skipped it entirely.
and stood in the sun waiting.
One of the teachers involved in the trial made a request last week for a poem on how dragons fly and two of the wonderful poets involved in There’s No Smoke Without Dragons came to the rescue so it is a big thank you from me to Angela Topping and LIz Brownlee.
Another bundle of papers came through the front door the other night. This time it was a sheet showing the pictures of the seven existing councillors who are standing again - Nigel Birch, Mary Fellowes, Rob Golesworthy, Fiona Howard, Steve Like, Alan Powell and Gareth Ratcliffe - with the slogan Your Town, Your Vote, Your Future. With that was a bit of extra information about Fiona Howard, recently retired head of Hay School, with her top priorities - a new school and community centre, and better car parking. Gareth Ratcliffe provided a record of his actions so far, and five pledges - to talk to residents and be open to debate, listen with an open mind, fight for our community, champion everyone's views and support the youth, sports and community organisations. Alan Powell the carpenter, who has been a councillor for six months so far, said in his piece that he had enjoyed it so far, and it had been an eye-opener to him what a big commitment it is to be a town councillor. Mary Fellowes provided a list of her achievements, and wants to see a new school, community/youth centre, and enhanced sports facilities.
Then Misha had to go and start his own charity organization.
“It’s a book that has the appearance – and at 534 pages, literally so – of a fearsome academic tract. But it avoids everything that frequently plagues academic writing: this book is instead engaging, readable, relevant, motivated by a clear political will and utterly indispensable not only for understanding the terms of the world we live in, where they came from, but also for what we do about changing them. It is a book written from the heart, albeit with the aid of a library the size of a palace – a people’s palace, that is!”
Stephen Dornan of ‘the rest’ is seen as possibly having the best chance since he unlike all the Scottish National Party Candidates actually lives in the Ward he wants to ‘represent’.
The five handpumps were doing a roaring trade when we were in serving some beautifully kept beers from the likes of Dent, Kirkby Lonsdale, Tirril, Ulverston, Coniston and Hawkshead with the standout being Staveley's own Hawkshead Windermere Pale. A 3.5% light session summer ale that picked up a brace of Silver medals at this year's Brewing Industry Awards and from SIBA. The Windermere Pale was Citra-tastic and very reminiscent of a slightly less bitter Fyne Ales Jarl. It was a lovely pint in a lovely pub.
2. Make a note of which one you like best.
Friday- Rest
We ended the last entry by admitting that something unnerving did in fact seem to be happening around and with Sister Lucy in the lead-up to the release of the so-called Final Secret. After all, the first two parts of the Message of Fatima had been publically issued by her Bishop in 1941, and the Third Secret sent to the Holy See with instructions that it be made public in 1960. That year was chosen according to Lucy because the “Holy Mother” had revealed to her that it would then be when “the Message will appear more clear.” And lo and behold it was immediately following 1960 that Vatican II set in motion what many conservative Catholics today believe is a crisis of faith in the form of Roman heresies.
floor — where the carpet was
to even stand next to each other.
Bright" in the earlier class.
9. Carry Me Away – 4:09
The beginning of thought is in disagreement—not only with others but also with ourselves.
I was invited to take part in a panel at Kingston University for their Green Growth, Business BootCamp. The aim of the sessions is to address the increasing need to develop environmentally more friendly products and services and help enterprises & entrepreneurs make the most of the opportunities created by increasing consumer demand, resource costs, and regulatory controls in the eco-field.
Some theaters may refuse to show this. Some may be turned off at the fact that Ayn Rand was an atheist. others will call it racist because it goes against everything our President stands for. I say we should ignore both critiques, and take the value of the substance from the material and use to to make ourselves better.
The feminine is like a breath of fresh air to a man, an escape from the harsh, uninviting world of work and competition. Qualities like emotional sensitivity, empathy, kindness, nurturing, beauty, softness and affection are what men seek in their girlfriends and wives. That is what makes us different and special and desirable.
Pants and belt and shirt and tie
It’s just if you don’t look good, it’s very easy for men to overlook you in that first instance. You have to develop other ways to attract them.
I can see now the real theme of Dream High 2. This season is certainly like the song the leads sung, “We’re B”. Dreams are not only for those who have the talent. Since we know the characters of DH2 certainly lacks star quality, like that of Sam Dong. However that said, they are still rightful dreamers that deserves to shine having their own unique light. This series just shows how imperfections can lead to something amazing since not everyone is gifted with natural talents. We are flawed in our own way and yet we can still use what we have and achieve our goals. Hae Sung finally found her strong point and she’s thriving to make the best of what she has. I also love that Hae Sung was able to find strength through her friends.
We need to ensure that our young broadcasters do not shy away from digging deeper because they are scared of being targeted by the authorities.
This is being entered into the following:
As they crawl out of the wreckage, the man sees the woman is blonde and strikingly beautiful. Then the woman turns to the man and gushes breathily: 'That's incredible - both our cars are demolished but we're fine. It must be a sign from God that we are meant to be together!'
At one point a couple of guys walked by to look at the game, and one turned to the other and knowingly explained, "Lord of the Rings." I got an internal laugh out of it, but was too busy helping my players resolve a combat to explain otherwise.
I was about a 1/3 down in the audience filming there were a few hundred at least in the audience.
The Rome of Luther’s day sounds like it could be any city in America right now. No wonder Luther wasn’t impressed.
Such confidence is somewhat justified. If 2011 saw the hit parade resemble an Ibiza foam party, and the rumbling sub-bass of dubstep become too loud to ignore, then no artist better defines this year’s pop climate. He’s been in the upper-echelons of the Top 40 for so long, he could probably demand squatters’ rights; with a No.1 album, Playing In The Shadows, two consecutive chart-topping singles – Changed The Way You Kiss Me and Stay Awake – and a guest appearance on Wretch 32’s Stone Roses-sampling Unorthodox, which peaked at number two.
Fudgy Toffee Butterscotch Cookies
and i just give em a cold shoulder.
Well-received was the NY Kosher Deli dog by Meal Mart. The reviewers noted an unexpected herbal taste, some slight spiciness and about average saltiness. Reviewers disagreed on the greasiness, two finding it to be very low, but the other finding it to be very high.
I read the most ridiculous passages from Levi Johnston’s memoir. From courting a doe-eyed teenage Bristol Palin to plotting to impregnate her just to piss of her lipstick bulldog mom. From discovering there were gay people in the world to cashing in on the Playgirl photoshoot.
Is there a rehab clinic for squash addiction? Butternut Ford Clinic perhaps?
In practice it is… fiddly.
That said, Ready Player One is just one big bundle of escapist fun, addictive too and – needless to say – it is a prime example of the Geek Novel, one that once you’re willing to overlook some of its shortcomings, will entertain you from Ready Player One to Game Over.
At 5pm when the museum closed, my car full of people headed back home, and CPT's car full of people headed to the commissary to get stuff for a cookout. I came home to blog, and he's still at the commissary. We're having a cookout tonight. Yummy!
**I do not recommend purchasing prefolds used. Cotton prefolds take the most abuse of the various types of diapers, as people tend to bleach them and as they are likely changed more frequently. If you buy preemie prefolds new, you can get four kids through them without needing to buy more.
stupid girls are always trying
In the pornos, people don’t think about life
Envelope: no.
Andrea said it is likely that automakers will not be able to assess the impact to vehicle output right away due in part to the complexity of the supply chain.
Nothing is really pointless, everything has a reason, but what am I doing? Sometimes I think I’m avoiding everything as much as possible. I feel like if I actually clean my room I won’t have any excuse not to study. If I actually get back into shape I won’t have an excuse to call myself lazy. Is that what I’m doing? Am I trying to avoid things like this? I think maybe I am. I think maybe I am doing my best to hide behind what I can so I don’t have to face the truth. Maybe once my room is clean and my clothes are put away I will have to face the fact that I have nothing better to do than to do my work for class. Maybe once I do drop the excess weight and have more muscle tone I can no longer say that someone doesn’t like me or that I can’t do something because I am out of shape. I won’t be able to place the blame on anything else other than myself and that’s scary. I like being able to hide behind my poorly constructed facades. I don’t want to know the truth. The truth hurts and I’ve been hurt enough. The problem is I can’ t continue to live my life this way and I know it. I can’t continue to avoid the truth because eventually it’s going to hit me whether I like it or not.
Oh learning to drive.
On Sunday morning, Matt, Rebecca and I had arranged to meet a couple visiting from New York at Alameda Open Space to show them some of our local birds. Naturally, that would be the one day of the year that the parking area was closed off for a Walk for the Cure event involving thousands of people in bright pink shirts making a long loop around the area. Fortunately we did manage to all meet up and had a most enjoyable morning of birding first at Alameda, then a quick visit (well, as quick as possible given the unexpected re-routing of traffic for the walking event) to see some Burrowing Owls, and ending up at Tingley Beach.
only to make Man
Aforementioned musical projects: Suite Indigo, Warm Worlds and Otherwise, Cyberpunk Honkytonk are the titles of the three cds I'm planning to issue. Each will have material remastered for inclusion, new tracks/new instrumental parts, and probably new cover art. I'll probably distribute them through reverbnation unless something striking catches my eye. They'll all be available after the first of the year-might stagger the releases from month to month.
local thrift store
AL West:
I will continue to keep you all posted.
Narrator Yes, hello to you too, little weed.
Dinner, was from the chippy formerly known as the Frying Squad in Larne. I had a battered sausage supper, Col had fish’n'chips and, the reason, dear readers, you don’t have a picture of said dinner, is because it disappeared faster than ice cream on a hot day!
yelling at me along the way.
The final part of this is from the revolutionary side of things and is the axiom of such conflicts and their outcomes:
unread food magazine in hand, to give it a try.
For the next month, I recovered, and in the days leading up to surgery, I was able to run, jump, dance.. most everything. So many of you prayed for me and I was just so thankful for those prayers. I was nervous when the nurse called a week before surgery telling me that I would need anesthetics, a nerve blocker, and a catheter. They told me that this was no simple surgery, because they would basically be reconstructing most of my knee. I was so comforted by all the prayers, cards, calls, texts, the prayer blanket etc. that I got from all of my friends and family. It really comforted me, and by surgery day, I wasn’t even scared.
my daughter loves stuffed animals. I have never been a fan (barbies on the other hand....!) anyways. I was slowly sneaking them out and putting them in the DI (thrift store) pile. Cause why would you need loads of stuffed animals? needless to say, she found them. and cried. and acted like life would never be the same if she didn't have her stuffed animals back..(the ones that have been missing for a good month and she hadn't noticed!) I told her I wasn't giving them away...I was going to make something special for her (LIE.) I was trying to defuse the situation. (she's a whiner...and would have whined until she had them all back and then she would have made sure they were never missing again!) Silly me though cause she will never let me forget things...she has kept asking, have you done anything with my stuffed animals yet? So, being the good mom that I am (okay, totally afraid of another freak out) I made something with her stuffed animals.......
If I were to pick one superhero trait,
Please Sign up for your subscription today on each one….
Vervacious is a family-owned store that sells high-quality balsamics, sauces, spices, and preserves. The store is absolutely GORGEOUS! You walk in a you feel like you are in a NYC loft. Everything is so trendy and unique, including their bottles and jars which are designed to stack on top of each other and to sit side by side.
The first few nights he unwittingly set off his own car alarm But once he figured that out there was no stopping him.
There is an inevitable dilution that comes with eclectic practice. I’d argue that it’s harder to connect with deities if you’re jumping from pantheon to pantheon, especially when their archetypal portrayal is often so linked with other deities & their familial relationships. Sometimes I weigh up justing picking one and sticking to it, but I can’t deny where my inclincations lie, and they seem to link up with one another so often. One problem I see a lot of new pagans encounter is a reluctance to begin working with a specific deity because they feel obligated to simply pick from one culture and don’t wish to be disrespectful or scattered in their studies. I’ve talked with seekers who agonise over which Goddess to write a ritual for because they don’t want to commit to something they haven’t done enough research on. A fair quandrary. My advice has been to simply dive in and see what works, and to not worry too much as it’s your own experience, your own relationship that you establish that counts, but I find this pill hard to swallow every now and then. The network of deities and/or archetypes that I have sought to establish relationships with include Isis, Bastet, Sekhmet, Osiris, Eris, Artemis, Pan, Brigid, Thor, Freya, Tyr, Saraswati and Ganesha, to name a few. Some links have been lukewarm and others fire-hot, but they are never consistent and I wonder what it would be like to stick to one mythological framework and test the results. Stay tuned on this one.
NEW: What about clones? – 1
In spite of its predilection for abstract noise, Kammerspiel is still at heart an album of songs and melodies which frequently follows the verse/chorus structure. Clearly, Conquering Animal Sound are more than just aimless experimentalists, because throughout there is a strong feeling that while you might not know what they are going to do next, they most certainly do. Probably the most naked song on the album is final track ‘Ira’, which dispenses with the effects, leaving the beauty and the melody of the song unadorned. It’s an interesting taster of what Conquering Animal Sound might be like were they a little more conventional, and while ‘Ira’ might be sufficiently pretty to stand on its own two feet, the contrast between it and much of the rest of the album illustrates the importance of the flourishes of the noises and samples.
Tell us how you think the library performs in relation to the services, resources or facilities that are most important to you. The survey is confidential and your honest input will make it very worthwhile.
Maybe to My closing scene, one with directors commentary or even enough stunt doubles to never have acted in the first place. Hell, had it not been for all those close ups I’d find my presence somewhat undetectable unless it was action packed wherein my mere existence would be camouflaged at the very least.
Country Morning w N. UM $9.00
And yeah, I shuffle a degree on top of all this. I’m a news-junkie.
Further thoughts:
I don't want you to live in a snouthouse, though, but not because I don't like you; it's because I think you're swell and I want you to be happy. Your house might be making you miserable, and you don't know why. I know why.
“Responding to the situation, Masuzoe said, “We want to implement measures based on local bodies’ opinions that unless we take a response similar to that of seasonal influenza, cities will cease to function properly.” His comments indicated that there was a need to switch to measures that took into consideration the influenza’s weak virulence.” Mainichi Japan reported.
READ THIS BOOK.
Tonight was definitely a shocker. Do you agree with the decision the coaches made tonight?
Associate Justice Don Beatty dissented in the 4-1 ruling, saying Dickey could have avoided the confrontation and was not inside the apartment building at the time of the shooting.
It is one thing to write a page or two of witty and entertaining dialogue, but quite another to keep the ideas flowing for the duration of a book. This story is entertaining and amusing throughout, and at times extremely funny. I got through it in a day which reflects both the fact that I enjoyed it so much as well as well as it being quite short.
This weekend I obsessed over money, whether the gazillion products I'm using on my face are even making a difference, and this yellow split pea salad with cilantro pesto from Heidi Swanson's Super Natural Every Day. I gorged on it both yesterday and today and am fully prepared to gorge on it this entire month because it's that good.
Jongbloed, a publishing company well-known for producing high-quality Bibles, partnered with the Ambo Anthos branch of the NDC/VBK publishing group, the leaders in the Dutch consumer book market, to launch the dwarsligger in September 2009 in the Netherlands.
It may or may not result in anything, but the realisation that my CV can provoke an almost instantaneous response is heartening. And somewhat amusing.
We spent three weeks in Colorado/Idaho/Utah over the summer for a bunch of weddings (FOUR siblings got married this summer!) - a post for another time - and right before we left, Simster managed to get a nice cut right on his eyebrow while playing around in the living room. We didn't have to do stitches again (just glue this time).
It was the best feeling when I got my keys! There of course was some drama that came along with them…considering I didn’t get them until 4 o’clock on move-in day….BUT…I’ve decided it’s not worth getting in to those details haha Why you ask? Because a girl went shopping and shopping rules this post!!! lolololololol
It's been around, so I'm not posting something incredibly rare. I mean, what is these days? I've just been enjoying it, so I thought you might, too.
I, and whichever Mom, is with me get ready for a wound up,
The name of the strip was Dick Doobie the Back to Front Man. It ran in Whoopee from 22nd April, 1978 till 9th September, 1978, a total of 20 appearances except in issue dated 8th July, 1978. Below are some scans, including that of the first episode. Am I imagining things, or is there really some resemblance to Robert Crumb's work?
Recently I attended a screening of Farm to School: Growing Our Future – a new documentary produced by Stephanie Heim and Lisa Gemlo of the Minnesota Extension Service and Minnesota Department of Health, respectively. It tells a story about farm to school partnerships in Minnesota through all the players: farmers, business owners, school principals, teachers, dietitians, school kitchen/cafeteria staff and students playing their part to make it work. In the end, kids learn what real food is.
The word echoes through my brain and my past hurtles towards me as I see the shiny metal marble shoot down the plastic steps; I feel faint, and have to look away. The President is done with survivor style games, he’s on to psychological warfare; I flash back to my parents’ basement . . .
Oriana is in another dimension and the people and creatures there are supes weird, says Felix. More weird than a disembodied cat head who laughs at his own jokes, apparently.
After I said I don't love all quilts, here's another quilt I really do love. Ashley is so talented. Of course she makes beautiful quilts! She announced that she will be doing a Quilt Along during the month of June...Wonder if I could still join if I have no clue what I'm doing?! Such a pretty quilt and she made it for her sister as a gift. Sweet. Go check it out.
Soon to come, my hierarchy of needs focusing on health & fitness.
We lugged over our packs and sure enough there was a small desk in a cramped hallway with a simple "Tower Air" sign slapped up on the wall.
Washington, D.C. - An analysis of new data on jail populations in the U.S. shows that the number of people confined in local jails is declining at a more rapid rate than in state and federal prisons. The Sentencing Project finds that from 2007-2010 the incarceration rate in jails declined by more than three times the rate of prisons, 6.6% compared to 1.8%.
This is a comprehensive report detailing United States plutonium production, acquisition and utilization from 1944 to 1994, and combines a summary of previously released data with newly released data pertaining to plutonium inventories at the Pantex site near Amarillo, Texas and in the U.S. nuclear weapons stockpile.
Thanks for lookingLove 'n' Hugs
Bigio’s lawyers said that for 15 years, the Coca-Cola Company has refused to negotiate with the family for fair compensation for the property, although the global soft drinks giant has made hundreds of millions of dollars in profit from Coca-Cola Egypt.
Each of the above phases in also involves changes of intensity and volume; starting with high volume-low intensity and progressing to high intensity-low volume.It’s important to note here that periodization was originally developed by for Olympic power lifters and was adapted to other sports where power is the specific goal(many anaerobic team sports such as football). This is because high intensity-low volume training(the end goal) is the best to train for power. Below is a breakdown of how this looks like.
And in your haste, not see his sorrow?
Just like her mother.
They also have a 100% 30 Day Money Back 'without asterick' return policy- if you aren't happy with it for any reason, you can return it. No tricks or hidden rules.
At Shoreline, Luce learns what the Shadows are, and how she can use them as windows to her previous lives. Yet the more Luce learns, the more she suspects that Daniel hasn’t told her everything. He’s hiding something—something dangerous. What if Daniel’s version of the past isn’t actually true? What if Luce is really meant to be with someone else? In this book, Luce questions her feeling for Daniel, and wonders if she really does need to end up with him even if the prophecy says so. Daniel is very protective and tries to keep Luce safe by telling her what to do. Luce doesn’t like this demanding side of him, and tells him so.
O Heavenly Father! Let there be peace all over the world, from Africa to Asia, from Asia to Europe, from Europe to America; from America to the Pacific; and to every corners of the world, to Your Glory in Christ Jesus, Amen!
Good Morning and Happy Monday,
Luckily, the width was the exact height of the headboard... I lucked out here.
I didn't do any preparations last night.
Andy's target wasn't just South Africa, he was quite a buff on world affairs. albeit they had little to do with the subject he was supposed to be teaching us, which, as I recall was Biology. He was particularly interested in America, not her constitution or history, you understand, but rather more focused on alleged CIA involvement in Central America, indeed it is likely that some of Andy's ex-students left school believing that the United States defining moment was either the Iran Contra scandal or the overthrow of the Allende government in Chile (and they probably now read at the blog from whence our recent visitors came.).
Hi. I’m Bob. I’m a marketing guy and a nudist. You might say I know a thing or two about exposure.
Boy was I glad I had already decided not to weigh tonight. I got the guy behind the counter! Ummm, no thank you. I don't want you to see I'm a gainer! LOL I really loved my WW meeting tonight. I am so thankful to be back at meetings. Even if I have an entire bad week, being in the meeting gives me a shot in the arm to retry and regroup and keep going. I didn't have a whole bad week, but Saturday through today weren't my best days, that's for sure!
There was a story on page 6 about a member of Congress named Carlos Raffo. I write not so much about why he is in the paper, but the nickname given to him by the paper.
“I’m ok,” I muttered quietly.
And now I look like an absolute loser to my daughter on top of it. I didn’t have a baby to have a friend. You’re not my friend, you’re my baby girl. I’m your mom. But I do think that some of the best lessons you can learn will come from my own life experiences. I don’t know what the lesson here is. Maybe it’s to savor life and not rush through stages like I did. Everything ended up great with my marriage and my family, but I think I sacrificed my friendships along the way. That’s a bit of a regret of mine. In any case, know that you’re not resented for my lack of social life. I love you more than words. More than life. It’s just that sometimes I hit a wall and feel like nobody notices at all…
I slept for a wonderful 13 hours on Monday. I'm not exactly sure how it was any different from usual though, I think that maybe I didn't sweat much or something. Also I think I may have fallen asleep on my back because my face was bleeding and I didn't want to stain my bed.
I then hid my copy.
A few weeks ago I got together with my mother-in-law for dinner and a movie. I wasn’t sure what to order so I let her go first. She ordered this French Country Salad. I read the description then ordered the exact same thing – dressing on the side, no beets please.
Feel free to discuss. And to disagree with me. Because you see I am NOT a megalomaniac, and can therefore endure and respond to dissenting opinons.
We had our engagement photo session with the lovely Mikaela of Mikaela Ruth Photography on Saturday. I think her work speaks for itself but I'm gonna say it anyway ... she is CRAZY talented. So excited & so blessed to have her documenting our special day.
Recommended for those interested in a drama focusing on a woman’s journey to find happiness and the strength of her lifelong friendship with a woman who seems like her polar opposite.
You could pass by one of us on the street and not even notice
However, beyond this, the rest is pretty “iffy.” I feel that such behavior as this, as well as any consequences which come from it, should have been the sole responsibility of the Detroit Tiger’s organization. There was no need to “bypass” that step and go directly to Bud Selig to execute judgement.
Contest rules -
One bus in particular was coming at us head on and slowed right down to a stop right in front of us, everyone got there cameras out ready to take pics of Pete and I before the driver realized that we were not who he thought we were lol. We cracked up.
Colored with PrismaColor pencils
You're a writer, and writers write. Even if their day job doesn't involve writing.
1/4 teaspoon cinnamon
“We could be dealing with illegal connections, under metering, no metering at all but we have to get a better handling on that,” he added.
The SECOND thing the angel said to her was that Elizabeth, the one who was considered barren, was 6 months pregnant!
Speaking about the concept of the track — “The track is inspired by my mates and even my own experiences. At some point, everyone I know has been given that classic line ‘Door Ni Kulne’ or had their parents complain to them about being on the phone or being lazy. It’s a fun and catchy track that everyone can relate to and Manak-E’s voice and delivery really bring the lyrics to life. ” Manni.
Harry Pendel: Welcome to Panama, Casablanca without heroes.
Gradually, as other believers lit their individual candles from a single flame, St Peter’s was flooded with light, the BBC’s David Willey reports from Rome.
The greatest modern warfare movie is not really about war. It is a strikingly unique and subtly realized version of the effects on a man of being a soldier. Staff Sgt. William James is one of the best assets the U.S. military has, and that status makes him profoundly alone. So all he can do is just keep on truckin’.
(Happy Birthday)
Thank goodness the process of shopping has changed dramatically over the years. I’ve gone from running around the state in search of that one item that nobody seems to have in stock, to buying 75-85% of the presents on-line and having them delivered to our front door…gift-wrapped.
c) Adding On: Their side is a goal to the good and they score to add a second goal to the lead
wonderful provenance to be able to add to my label
This term is my own coinage, dating to 1999. (If anyone used the phrase earlier than that, I was unaware of it but would be happy to credit it if it is brought to my attention.)
But first, a very casual outfit for me. This is what I wore to go do some stuff downtown (get a new bank card, mail parcels, exchange a birthday gift, go for lunch with L):The last of the new-to-me sweaters that I thrifted in the early summer - this one is a lovely thick cotton knit and was all of $3.75. It's Banana Republic, and it's very nice quality. How can I tell? It's not "cut and sew," where the knit is cut like a pattern and sewn together. It's knitted in the shape it is. It has NO SEAMS (except for the cuff around the neck). No seams up the sides, not seams down the inside of the arms, no seams where the arms are joined to the body. That costs a lot of money to make knit garments that way and it's a good mark of quality.
receive more and more of it every day, because it is God’s answer to all life’s
And the No. 1 movie remake starring Atty. Vitaliano Aguirre and Sen. Miriam Defensor-Santiago…
Orange pomanders
I also wanted to let you know that I updated my sponsor page! I am still doing free ad swaps but I added a large ad feature! Go here for more info! Because it's the first month I'll be doing paid ads, the first 3 can buy an ad for free with the promo code: designs! Hurry up before someone else claims them! :)
Then we got what I considered the first shocker of the day in the women's 10000. With a group running together most of the race, Meseret Defar (ETH) took over on the backstretch of the final lap and looked to be in control coming off the final turn and heading up the finishing straight. But suddenly she seemed to falter and teammate Meselech Melkamu went by her. Then with a spurt 19 year old Linet Masai (KEN) went right by Melkamu at the line as Melkamu raised her arms in what she thought was victory! Defar never falters, but did here and what seemed like sure gold with 50 meters to go turned into a 5th place finish. Amy Yoder Begley was the top finishing American in 6th place.
So here's looking forward to the summer...looser schedules, no homework hanging over my head, and a stack of books that's been waiting for me to devour. I might still be able to find excuses not to keep up with my blogging, but they probably won't be as noble.
I have no idea what’s going on with me – I never lose anything!
For the first time ever, I'm looking forward to a downpour.
Doing this steep ascent in the wet and lush rainforest made me realize how unprepared and unfit I am. Panic set in as I climbed those steps and puffed and panted my way along. Honestly, I felt exhausted after maybe 10 minutes of walking. My breathing was bad, my head felt light and I felt utterly useless. Shame and sadness set in too at my state- and I really let my mind get the better of me.
Transfer the solids to a small saucepan and add the water. Bring to a boil over medium-high heat. Cover, reduce the heat and simmer for 10 minutes. Remove from the heat and let cool completely. Add the contents of the saucepan to another 1-quart Mason jar, seal and store at room temperature out of direct sunlight, for 1 week, shaking once a day. Strain through cheesecloth until all solids have been removed and add the liquid to the bourbon mixture. Add the rich simple syrup and shake to combine. Let stand for 3 days and strain through cheesecloth again to remove any debris. The bitters will last indefinitely, but
Now if this were to really happen, who fits the bill? India is a young country, and; the young generation would love to have a young President if given a chance. The President should be someone who is always in the news for the bold decision he takes and thereby controversies that he generates. At any given point of time half a dozen OB vans belonging to various media houses ought to be stationed outside the official residence of the Prez awaiting breaking news or some juicy stories.
We are all called by love and freedom. They are our nature. We are unified and whole. Through awareness we can practice consciously taking the hand of love. In practice this simply means feeling what is already there. And guess what, freedom is right there with it.
I now have a clear shop section where you can find all my current work for sale, as well as a better view of my categories of work. I hope you like it!
Heatwave? Check
I do not employ the phrase ‘ lunatic Commission decisions’ above lightly. Any unelected and yet sovereign body happy to take on the welfare needs of these workers at a time of euro meltdown must be deranged at least. To enumerate the idiocy involved here:
Thaw the pastry shells at room temperature for 40 minutes or until they’re easy to handle. Heat the oven to 400°F. Lightly grease 2 baking sheets.
**Bronzing Brush (flat top): (coastal scents/crown/royal) LOVE this brush -- thick, full and soft. The flat top helps with a more full coverage when using my MSF natural powder.
Totally gracious and very down to earth.
Professor Rashib: That’s wrong, woman! Strokes should be upward.
The novels are suspense, first and last. They aren't boy-meets-girl, or will-they, won't-they. The romance in the stories grows out of the characters' lives. So it's deep, sometimes risky, and worth fighting for. As it is for all of us.
2. No, I will not promote any woo or bad science as my 20,000th tweet.
The Gift of the Holy Ghost
Would you wanna know creation of God
The studio had all the cheeseball pictures required of such establishments: the “I can’t wait to graduate;” the “book me for your next movie and/ or commercial” headshot; the forced child poses that therapists accept as referrals. You know, the usual.
"Good god," he said.
Like loving someone who doesn’t exist
At least Pete seems to be much happier,
As usual, writing at 2:30am makes me terse and a little less than inspired with my entry, but I enjoyed painting so much today that I had to make a post before sleeping.
Come back on Sunday to hear what Susanna has been up to
His boat is empty.
Many observers, myself included, have a great deal of respect for the role the Burkinabè, particularly Foreign Minister Bassolé, have played throughout this crisis. Bassolé has demonstrated quiet, effective diplomacy and a knack for heading off conflicts. But the ECOWAS heads of state, with their deadlines and threats, have put him in a difficult position. The risk now is that more Malians (especially those in and around Bamako) will start to perceive the current crisis as pitting Mali’s needs against sinister foreign agendas, as the country’s anti-globalization left has been depicting things all along. Up till now those radical anti-ECOWAS voices have been a tiny fringe, but in light of the heavy-handed tactics recently adopted by ECOWAS, they are growing louder and more numerous by the day, putting further attempts at outside mediation in jeopardy. An anti-ECOWAS rally has already been announced for Thursday.
After I left America, comedy kind of exploded for a certain type of comedian.
Today’s cranes interrupt my thoughts. Two are bugling. Their ‘unison bugle’ tells us we are watching a mated pair. He points his bill to the sky and bugles forth with a slower deep call that fills this open valley. Her bugle is higher, more rapid and she doesn’t point so high with her bill. We look carefully. It’s not Peg Leg.
Deuteronomy 7:13 says: “He will love thee, and bless thee, and multiply thee: He will also bless the fruit of thy womb, and the fruit of thy land, thy corn, and thy wine, and thine oil, the increase of thy wine, and the flocks of thy sheep, in the land which He sware unto thy fathers to give thee.”
Ramirez said anyone who claims in writing to be a Native American should have some sort of supporting documentation. “If you’re a member of a federally recognized tribe, then that means you would have a tribal enrollment number,” he said.
and the winner is…
27) WHAT IS YOUR DREAM CAR?
When Biermann visited West Berlin to perform in a concert, the East German authorities declared him to be an "enemy of the state", and refused him re-entry to his homeland. Nina's mother went too. Nina, making the false claim that he was her natural father, applied for an exit visa, but was refused.
Fast forward to December 2011, when my mom declares that she should knit a second pair of socks and I remind her that I gave her yarn and needles. She can't recall, and goes and finds the barely-started socks in a drawer. (Minus the ball band and any identifying yarn information, of course.)
You can call my "Jack of all trades" master of none, hahaha, because is true!*grin*
The early renewal of the company’s largest TV distribution agreement covers 18 million homes. ‘The terms of this agreement better reflect rates in today’s competitive distribution environment,’ according to ShopNBC, which anticipates a reduction in annual TV distribution costs by about $15 million beginning next January.
You never know when your luck is going to run out:
It was on my list.
“@OleGunner: Whoever starts in place of RVP has to do the same thing he does. Nothing radical. Just, control the ball with 4ward momentum & take shots”
But, this never dimmed Ed’s view on life. He never complained about his inability to walk, but embraced his lifestyle, grateful to be alive. Ed thrived, no matter what his situation, and was an inspiration to everyone who knew him.
We have survived another year and now it's time to celebrate!
And, as Brooks pointed out, the prescription drug benefit is well targeted too. Older people are one of the major conservative groupings in society. Age and experience has taught them caution. So if a political party leaves it to its opposition to woo away its own support base, it is moronic indeed. That they are the realists is another historic claim of conservatives and the political reality is that if the GOP had not supported the prescription drug push, it would have just have sent a big slice of elderly GOP voters off to vote for the Democrats instead. It may be worth noting that Australia's conservative government was at the same time in the midst of expanding its Medicare expenditures too.
Any reporters want to look into this? Email SBU to discuss further. sbpdundercover *at* gmail.
Probably raised a mormon but definitely a mormon now either way. Kind of started early in life with a little bit of a disadvantage by being big boned (not an excuse for being a douche) and due to that more likely than not became the target of ridicule by those vicious little grade schoolers in his developmental years. Then he, as have we all, reached some apex in his life where the choice had to be made. Do you, in light of your disadvantages become the perpetual victim and allow the unacceptance of the world around you to send you spiraling in a direction which ultimately leads to anger, bitterness, hatred, wrath, and the drive to force others to conform to you by means of force? Or do you simply do as one of the wisest among us said and “Empty your mind. Be formless. Shapeless, like water. Now you put water into a cup, it becomes the cup. You put water into a bottle, it becomes the bottle. If you put water in a tea pot, it becomes the tea pot Now water can flow or water can crash Be water my friend.” This man taught that there is natural instinct and control and both are extremes which cannot be solely depended on, rather both were needed in balance. This is very similar to what I mean when I speak of universal duality though that’s a different date I think. This is a philosophy which allows you to be by way of allowing others to be.
-Attend events related to your topic. If you have the means to do so, you can attend seminars or even take classes that relate to your subject. Online courses are another option.
Handi is a round spherical shaped clay pot. The bottom is thick. The top has a wide-mouth opening about 85% of the middle of the pot. The opening is supported by a very narrow neck that flares out to form broad rim. There is no handle so the pot is lifted by grabbing the rim. A clay saucer is used as a lid and placed on the top. The lid is sealed with hard paste made of flour and water. The Handi is left on the charcoal for several hours, till the food is to be served. The heat creates the steam, it condenses and rolls down the curved walls. 'Dum' means warm breath signifying the steam. The 'Pukht' means choking. 'Dum Pukht' means choking the steam and prevent it from escaping. .
Not so long ago my fifth-grade child turned in a sloppy book report and brought home a poor grade. I started in with a lecture on taking pride in your work and soon enough I had worked into a lather about taking your time, checking your work and that sloppy work was unacceptable. As I built to a crescendo, I realized that my child hadn’t gotten a word in edgewise in about 10 minutes. Nor had she looked up at me. Eighty percent of what I said had not registered. She had probably disengaged from my 100 mph lecture and was simply awaiting the pronouncement of a punishment or for me to stop talking.
"Julia Waltham, from the British Heart Foundation, said:
At first I thought this post would be all about the kids again, but really, who am I kidding? We as adults snack as much as youngsters do, so I am not gonna profile here, this post is for everyone!
really educational. For years I've been saying to friends,
Anyway, this was a real highlight with very considered questions from Sunday Times journalist Nicolette Jones and brilliant answers from Patrick. Nicolette questioned him quite closely about the waterboarding scene in The Ask and the Answer and he told us that he often, as an exercise with writing studies, got them to think about someone they loved and then imagine a scene of violence against that person. He said that if there is violence required by the plot, it should always feel as horrible for the reader as if it were happened to someone close to them.
It was boring pine stand which I painted my favorite color WHITE.
I should add that the intersection of virtual and physical participation is not limited to tourism conferences. We are paying attention to the upcoming Rio+20 and the World Conservation Congress.
an entire house with the same color ...
“Okay, I get it. I was only suggesting it because. Well. If it’s not random, crazy hormones running amok in your body, I have to admit, I’m seriously concerned. The last time you had this much trouble, you were starved, verbally abused, neglected, treated like a slave, worked thirty hours a week while going to school and was being forced out of house and home by the man who should have been protecting you.”
And among them are people that sometimes hurt. And when they hurt, I hope they know that I will do what I can. Because I know what it is to hurt. And that sometimes, all someone needs is a friendly voice. One that says, “It’s OK to hurt. It’s OK to cry. It’s OK to be human.”
The Newcastle preview comes up in tomorrow’s post.
Recent product updates by Apple among others have brought the possibility of the phone becoming part of, if not the centre of, your home media system. While it’s been possible for years to integrate a phone into your audio or video setup, the new Airplay feature takes this one step further by wirelessly streaming media content from your phone to a device such as the new Apple TV or other compatible device connected to your sound system or HD TV.
Be prepared for BIG GETS posts in the future.
In the event of a tie-breaker, please complete the following statement:
Fouts says:
This band’s projects/live shows are based on music, visuals and fashion, as they normaly wear leather jackets and wayfarers on stage.
I am not a technophobe, nor a Luddite, nor an old bird who can't cope with computers, yes several strangers have hinted at That one during the last couple of years
Anyway, the point is I’m just absolutely in love with her books, and have been forever, and I usually reread at least one of her series every year… But their kind of like Pringles for me—Once I start reading once series, I want to reread them all. *sigh*
First of all, my apologies, because with my frantic schedule, I am not able to draw a winner from the October Color Challenges yet, but I will get to that as soon as I can. Thank you all for the patience you show us when we run into these little (annoying) snags!
What’s more important than eliminating the bad foods from your plate? Adding in the good ones! We can eat something that makes us feel gross or great and this salad makes me feel great! I love this watercress and fennel salad not only for its fresh taste but also the way my body feels after I eat it. I feel well nourished, energized and ready to take on the rest of my day. Watercress is a small tender leaf with a light peppery taste and has been long known to have medicinal qualities. In fact, Hippocrates, “The Father of Western Medicine”, had such a strong belief in its healing powers that he built his first hospital next to a stream so he could grow watercress to use to treat his patients. Watercress has anti-cancer and anti-inflamatory properties, is high in vitamin C, is high in lutein and zeaxanthin (great for eye health), has been shown to alleviate eczema and is a blood cleaner.
preheat oven to 425°
Years ago, when I lived in Chicago, another, decidedly less savory Reginald Shepherd popped up when I searched myself. An apparent career criminal (all that came up were his various arrests), he was something of an evil doppelganger. I once was almost denied an apartment because there was a record of my arrest for “criminal shoplifting” (I always wondered what legal shoplifting was) in 1991, two years before I moved to Chicago. And once I received a letter from a social service agency that some woman had named me as the father of her child. I had to call and explain that the last time I had been in the vicinity of a woman’s vagina was the morning I was born. One of the other Reginald Shepherd’s old addresses even appeared on my credit report, an error (among others) I had to call and write in order to rectify. My criminal double has either settled down into legal respectability or died (either is equally likely), as he hasn’t shown up in my web searches for several years. I would like to think that he has seen the error of his ways and now become a law-abiding citizen, but I have no great desire to inquire further.
• Michael Smith just tracked this case for his "Recent Rulings for Defendants" list, and notes: "For those of you keeping score, that drops the 2007 win rate for plaintiffs to 33% and the two-year win rate to 57%."
It is no longer accurate to say that people look at obnoxious marketing because they like what it is showing them. It is more accurate to say that such advertising makes people look at it because we are visual creatures and hundreds of thousands of years of evolution have taught us to pay attention to brightly colored moving objects, because those objects might be useful, or more to the point, dangerous, and we must react accordingly.
The SORROWS IN ITALY portion is pleasant if standard Eurorock, where the freakbeat gets mixed up with what I'd call a tamed Kinks aesthetics and of course a few Eyetalian language numbers thrown in to wow the signoritas over there the same way that "Sie Lieb Dietch and "Komm Und Holt Der Hand" had all the krauts burning their Horst Jankowski albums in defiance of national pride. A nice example of what was going on rock-wise not only in England but the continent during the time before the big progressive putsch got into effect (some references of which can be noted here if only by the appearance of two covers of Traffic's "Dear Mr. Fantasy" not forgetting the occasional sitar twang).
My Hello Kitty by Sephora polishes also like to be seen. They sit next to some other HK items, and off to the side you see Mark Hoppus from blink-182 peeking out from a book cover. Haha!
the fragile edge of danger!
Riki makes the delivery, but while on his way home, his curiosity (which Katze warned him about) gets the best of him when Iason Mink speeds past him.
Old Rivers...Walter Brennan
“Barry,” she said softly. Tina blocked him, but he looked at the ground and shrunk into his coverall. Barry tried to turn and go back the other way, but Tina held his arm and whispered his name again. “Barry.
Some busy days have just passed, finally today I'm on Heaster holidays but I caught a flu T_T" I'm so unlucky
2) Many don't know who George Soros is.
See the sun in the South of France that Van Gogh experienced
Look who’s the foodie now..oooohhh yeah..! *thumbs up*
Switching over to the world of MAXIM reveals an entirely different take on the idea of “sports writing.” MAXIM throws its own commentary in the ring of sports of discussion in Maxim’s Guide to Improving Baseball. This article decides to give satirical suggestions on how baseball should be played instead, with new rules and ideas to make it “better.”
Well, when I saw the commercial for Huggies new Little Movers Slip-on Diapers I could not stop laughing because my youngest son is the REASON for that product! My son Cash is 15 months old and never ever stops moving! He is the youngest of three, and yet, I am still surprised at his capability to wiggle away from me. I call him my "Little Houdini." He is so wiggly, and I wish I was kidding, but many times if it's just a wet diaper, I will just change his diaper while he is standing up because he HATES it when I lay him down to change his diaper! I also many times just let him go without pants because it takes less time to change the diaper when I don't have to remove pants! But sometimes when I don't have him in pants, he can wiggle out of his diaper all together! Aaaack! Somehow, I just don't remember my older two being this hard to change!
Browse through an incredibly bulky but useful website listing iPad training sessions. Click any of the session dates and you’ll get workshop agenda, links, handouts, lesson plans, and instructional ideas.
lists of what they ruled.
Question is, if you don’t have your own office where you can close the door, is the bathroom a judgement-free zone?
The young man was a hard worker.......
Well, those in the Valley who love a good happy hour with decent food and cocktails at a decent price in a relatively upscale setting can find a great place to enjoy all this without having to trek to the Westside: at Katsuya by Starck at the Americana at Brand in Glendale.
After about 30 seconds, pour in wine and broth, "stirring to de-glaze the pan."
Shirt - Spanish shop
Clothes: My outfit of choice these days is my scummy pants (aka Yoga pants that have never been to yoga.) When I get home from work each afternoon I give Nolen kisses and run upstairs to change. Ahhh scummy pants, everyone should own a pair!
Tabletalk Magazine
Back to running. With only 4 days left before the marathon, I am pretty pumped up. Trying to stay calm and relaxed is becoming more of a challenge as Boston prepares for the race. All over the city, everything is buzzing with marathon fever. I can’t wait!
Gasp! Yes!
That sounds very much like one of the UN's definitions of genocide to me.
"Morning Ritual"
You stated:
Hey Strangers!! Still no new computer, so I'm back with a super quick post. Miss E's laptop has a mind of its own, and makes it very frustrating to write on. The cursor jumps around while you type. Argh!!
As for my predictions, I was right on 6 of 11, and I'm sure the $99 price point will hit. That puts me at about 63%. Not perfect, but better than anything the print industry has predicted. Plus, there are still five months left in the year, so perhaps my percentage will go up.
Ta-ta for now!
Vedanta has the support of various arms of the British government which helped float it on the London Stock Exchange. It also has an interesting relationship with the international NGO Action Aidwhich on the one hand, appears to oppose it vociferously, and on the other has praised it for its “good work” in the Niyamgiri area and has received funds from the company’s subsidiary Sterlite.
Last month, hubby and I spent a little time in France. Well, not France but it sure felt like it.
Some food for thought from Patter's blog:
Back in the attic, I moved to the last trunk tucked away deep in the corner. It had been draped in an old sheet that had been made into a child sized ghost costume long ago. The only trouble was that this trunk was locked. I put the ghost costume on the save pile and I brought the boxes of journals down stairs. I found a screwdriver in the ‘catch all’ draw in the kitchen and went right back up to work at the ring with the lock hanging on it.
O master! what a strange infection
With a little bit more time on my hands than usual, I have been able to make it to the farmer’s market nearly every week since I have been home and was also lucky enough to spend the morning with my friends Alex and Zach on the farm they work on in Connecticut, Riverbank Farms.
a time for war and a time for peace.
Before I got into lolita, I don't think I ever wore brand clothing. Sure, it was nice for me if I'd have an expensive brand item every once in a while, but I never paid much attention to it. The same goes for makeup: as long as it did its job, I was fine with it. I didn't care about brand names at all.
The waitings craned their necks trying to see past the screen to the opposite banquette, but had to hop back to their normal bar positions as Nathan leapt up to head for the bar.
It is the raggedness that gives these places their charm. Paris with its strict planning rules and its facade of wealth makes for a very homogeneous picture which in itself can become dull. The suburbs, with their tower blocks neighbouring quaint houses and Parisian style Haussmannian buildings makes for a much more disorderly spectacle. As you walk through the suburbs, you literally never know what will be around the corner.
Mrs. Päivi Kunnas
Red food colouring (I find the gel sort is the best)
But…do we need to keep reminding the world that we need “special treatment”…for if we keep asking for “crutches”, how do we become equals (with men and other creatures)?
Well, despite having been kicked out of the Garden, we are told that God still spends regular time with His creation and talks and interacts with them. And in Verse 16 we see that they have been living next to Eden, because Cain has to travel from there to Nod, in the East.
I really haven't had a break for over two weeks here as the guys called me back to the shop to cover for Andre who is taking a two week course. It was far busier then it was when i was there part time and hope they can bring me back. The search for work continues and yet the phone is not ringing. There are so many looking for work the competition is fierce and with the kids out of school makes it even tougher.
The black box perched on Gerald’s desk, humming to itself. It had been there for a few days - and until now he’d studiously avoided it. Where it had come from he had no idea – but then things had a habit of materializing from nowhere in Heaven.
Frederick the Simple (Treasurer), Vagrant
4th half-triangle on the left.
"oh ok" he said. in my head i was like "phewwwww!" glad he didn't press on the question coz i really forgot about the physics of it. muahaha! =p
For the onesies, I first piped an outline with stiff white icing, and then filled it all in with thinned white icing. Once that dried overnight, I piped on an outline with stuff blue icing, as well as blue details including buttons and a little heart in the center of the onesie.
So! On my quest to find yummy gluten free meals that don't take a lot of money to prepare (because, let's face it, all the gluten free flours and everything else you need to mimic the effects of gluten on food are expensive), I've resorted to a lot of Asian food.
York.
“Who is this Kozlov?” she asked, her tone urgent. “Why was he here tonight?”
Despite his static camerawork and interchangeable characters, you simply cannot be bored by Méliès’ best work, because you can never predict how the course of events, familiar as they are, will flower visually. In Conquest, as in earlier adventure films, we begin with a meeting of scientists in a great academy, debating the merits of the voyage and the means of executing it. We see the bizarre craft being built in an air hangar, then the voyage itself, and the concluding action once the craft has reached its destination. Repetitive, perhaps, but in almost every case a magnificent melding of painted backdrops, complex props, and in-camera special effects.
to pumpkin and add to cream cheese. Add sugar, milk and sprinkle
Despite the fact that Harry has the uncanny ability to make me act like some threatened only child, I just can’t get enough. Even better, there’s something quietly exciting about knowing I get to see him grow up – I can guarantee that along the way he is going to be hysterically funny, never boring and more than a little bit awesome. We’ll probably still be fighting… but that’s my job. I’m his nemesis after all – every future superhero needs one.
I really like this better. It isn't as crowded as it looks. I don't have any walls separating, kitchen, dining and living room, except a short wall. When I need the arm chairs I just scoot them around. Makes is so much easier. I love my table with the gourd eggs, but moved them over on the shoe foot table. This is one of my 2 New England pieces. As you know almost all of my furniture is southern, but I love NE. I have a blanket chest also. Well, I hope I haven't bored you with my post today. I don't usually show gifts, because they are so personal, but thought these were okay to share. It always make me happy when you come Through My Back Door where life is good.
But, nonetheless, as in his factual findings regarding closed-door details of exchanges between Cline and Hudson, Judge Hobgood was willing to give Cline (or in this case, her attorneys) the benefit of the doubt. He therefore did not dismiss out of hand the Cline team’s arguments that her “caustic” statements should be viewed through the prism of her First Amendment rights.
How immature is that? Getting bitter about missing out on things because I put my priorities with school ahead of hockey this season is just dumb. No, I haven’t been able to watch west coast teams play much at all this season so I have no idea who all these Blues players are and I didn’t know the Coyotes were so good. And sure, my predictions keep being way off, but expecting number one seeds and a team with a Vezina trophy candidate to win their series is not being ignorant. It’s looking at the numbers side to hockey. And through these past 10 years I should have learned that hockey is so unpredictable and any team can win so being wrong is no big deal. No one cares about what you write in a preview.
Prepare yourself to see the unseen as you’ve never seen it before.
For Simon his first National Championship was sweeter after a disappointing — and painful — year. He narrowly missed making the 2010 Olympic Team and then he broke his back when another skater pushed him and he crashed into the wall surrounding the ice.
That was enough for me. I took hold of Jane's arm and gave a firm tug. "Let's go." But I know my wife, and I ought to have known better than that. Eyes still fixed on the first three steps leading up to the attic, head cocked sideways in an almost comical manner straining to hear, she whispered: "It sounds like there's someone up there." Now, I don't know about most people, but I don't do well with declarations such as those, under circumstances such as these. Anything bearing an even remote similarity to the typical fright-fest dialogue of "They're coming to get you" or (heaven forbid) "They're here" and I'm a running fool with feet flying out ahead of me like a leaper over hot coals. But I suppose that I would willingly trade bearing sole witness to any of those proclamations in exchange for what we heard next, which is something that my rational mind still grapples with, something that if I live to be 100 I will never, ever forget. The voice was soft, and low, muffled by the rafters and the overhead floorboards that separated us from the attic, and it called the words: "David, is that you?"
I hope you are having a great week so far!
unfeeling our feelings from pills
By Pastor Chinedu Obi.
Good Vibrations
I’ll post one challenge every week. All you have to do is take the prompt and write a post based on it! And I’d love for you to come back and link it in the comments, so I can see what you’ve come up with.
CROSSES
The price, as the old song says, is all right.
and we were ten years
The room Ian had booked was a small and modest venue compared to his flamboyant past enterprises like AV, see: http://hpanwo.blogspot.co.uk/2009/11/alternative-view-3-part-1.html. The room he’d hired was behind a small entrance leading off from the kitchen that looked like the door to a broom cupboard. Ustane and I were the first to arrive and we were surprised to see nobody at the desk by the door. Then we looked around to see Ian setting up the DVD stall. His short and compact frame moved energetically between a pile of cardboard boxes and the trestle table. We soon learned that the Shift 2 tour was entirely a one-man operation. Ian transports everything in his van, he sets it all up and puts it all away afterwards entirely by himself. This is hard work for him, but it keeps the ticket price down. In the neighbouring suite to our event was a much more lavish conference hosted by some charity or other. It was held in a large auditorium with a big stage display, a neat reception desk, a tea and coffee bar and all the trimmings, a bit like AV. Sure, it would have been a lot more comfortable if Ian had laid on such luxuries, but then it would have cost an awful lot more; it’s a simple equation. Shift 2 is very good value, when you consider it was seven hours long, almost as long as a live David Icke show. This is a format that I’ve not seen from Ian before. I’ve attended numerous events in which he does a one or two hour lecture, but never before an all-day workshop.
Before leaving on the trip she had checked over the luggage in the attic and concluded they did not have enough, so she had gone downtown and bought three elegant, darkly burnished leather suitcases. They were so beautiful that she was easily persuaded by the salesman to buy a set of canvas covers to protect the leather. These covers, to be sure, were ugly – as coarse as Boy Scout pup tents – but she bought them and had them fitted onto the suitcases. The covers remained on the suitcases while they were aboard ship, and as they had been in each city only a few days she had not bothered to remove them, but now she decided to see if the leather was being protected. She unfastened one of the canvas jackets, peeled it halfway off, and there – as beautiful as though still on display – the leather gleamed. Well pleased, she buttoned the cover.
As one browses through the current affairs of the intellectual property world, definite trends and patterns are easily noticeable. International IP institutions continue to work towards upward harmonization - more stringent standards. More awareness campaigns are being spread to inform people about intellectual property rights and their value. While intellectual property rights are getting more standardized and harmonized, I often wonder something more fundamental. Why should they be – in any sense? I know how it’s happening – a few whispers and a few suitcases to the right people in America (usually), and there’s a butterfly effect across the rest of the world – but let's look a little deeper into the issue.
* Winners will be announced around Nov. 15.
I have not a single picture.
SUPER DUPER EXTREMELY GINORMOUS THANK YOU TO HELEN!!!
Exercising: But I did hit the gym a lot this week..and we did a good hike in the sand along the coast today.. Its tough to walk in sand! My muscles are super sore today!
Now, usually when I go skating, I get a lift back with Paula, as it finishes too late for one of the parents to come and get me. However, this week she wasn’t going to be there, so that option wasn’t open to me. I asked Heather and Ellie if I would be able to go with them yesterday, but unfortunately the car was full, as they were also going with Connor and Laura. I couldn’t really think of any other way of getting back, plus The Father was drunk by the middle of the afternoon today, so it didn’t look as if I would be able to get there. Last night I was texting Heather about it, and I told her not to worry, as something will work out, something always works out. Guess what? Something worked out!!! :) Laura decided this afternoon that she wasn’t going for one reason or another (I DON’T CARE, SHE DIDN’T INVITE ME TO HER PARTY!!!) so Heather texted me saying I could get a lift there and back if I still wanted it :D
This week the menu portion of our meal plan looks something like this:
Actually, according to a Kaiser Permanente study, the news gets worse. When compared to non-Hispanic white women, Hispanic women are more likely to be diagnosed at a younger age, have cancer that has already spread beyond the breast, have tumors with cell type that have a poorer prognosis, have larger tumors, and have tumors that cannot be treated with some of the most effective medicines.
DJ Magik Cool J : Producer, DJ, Songwriter
I know the following things about insomnia. It doesn't kill you (at least not directly). It's very boring. It's usually stress based (but not this time, since this is an extremely non-stress time in my life, except for the insomnia). It has an element (at least in my case) of self-fulling prophecy. And it's very boring (well worth mentioning again).
3/4 cup plus 1 tsp granulated sugar
1 successful
Grandma sent us boys out each a suit of clothes and an extra pair of pants.
I was given this book as a free copy from Free Press Book Tours on Book Blogger.
Pin - stash
However, as I munched away I felt terrible for not sharing. I figured, if he has my genes then he could handle some sugar.
My girls were absolutely horrified. And I must admit that I was a little upset by it as well. Though I do understand the need for protecting one's produce, I just hate the thought of killing cute little animals, annoying as they can be. (Of course, I did have very different thoughts for a certain gray squirrel last year around this time...) Besides, our Chippy was the closest thing we had to a pet.
If you attend my funeral, please wear red. Make sure my loved ones do not bury me in shoes, and make sure they don't let the undertaker make me look ridiculous. I want beautiful music and lots of storytelling. All that will be great once I'm gone from this Earth. But, while I'm here, give me my flowers while I live. It has come to my attention lately that we don't "give people their flowers" until it's too late for them to enjoy the beauty, the colors, the sentiment. I'm changing that. The people in my life will know how they are appreciated and loved, and they will smell the aroma of their flowers as often as I get the chance to tell them. This blog is about the blessings in my life. Mainly, it's about the people who keep my world spinning on a good axis and help me realize that work, bills and stress mean nothing.
-Build a community – with your readers, other writers, workshop attendees.
Offspring Come out and play US
It's noticeable that ATP Recordings acts have been handed primetime slots - but then it's ATP's party and they can fix the bill in their favour if they want to. Exhibit A: APSE, making the first of two appearances in Reds Bar. At least I think it's Apse - it's hard to believe that the band who stand before us are the same band responsible for Spirit. But 'tis indeed they, and a set heavy on new material from its successor Climb Up proves a real disappointment, suggesting an abandonment of Spirit's atmospheric, tribal and frequently fascinating post-rock in favour of bland structure and convention.
I will continue this defense that to be set free from the world affections of things such as pornography, new affections must replace it and they must be stronger and greater than the powerful pull of pornography. Point two from Chalmers tomorrow.
P.S. The beautiful red dress was my mom's. She wore it in 1977 when she was crowned Memorial Day Queen. Love.
Card Stock: Stampin' Up, Gina K, and Couture
I'm looking forward to the reps getting more new stuff... and I hope I'm there when they come in!
Gals can go for fishnet stockings or the neon colored ones, jeans which accentuate the knock knees (I have fond memories of this one), knee length print dresses, with wide belts to show off that thin waist and sexy hips. Team these with chunky bracelets. Crop tops are also back. But you need to have a perfect curvy figure to flaunt with these tops. Sailor stripes, striped skirts, shorts, and dresses are the current trend with the retro look. The baby doll dresses, mini skirts and leggings are simply everyone’s pick. How I can forget mentioning “Prachi Desai’s” BOBBY look in Once Upon A Time in Mumbaai”. Fun, feminine and flirty ruffles with skirts, dresses and blouses.
The central mechanism is the use of a D20 to make attacks, the comparison of the roll to a table matching ability with protection, and the loss of hit points, hit points being a measure of capacity for injury. There are two tables, one for PCs / NPCs and one for monsters, again, something easily picked up with play. The concept of saving throws for various effects is explained well, with a short table for each of four diferent groups.
We are an offering to You
But after a few days, it seemed lonely. I wanted Megan to dance longer, too. And that's when the idea of turning this into a mini-commentary on "why can't Amy raise goats and chickens in her backyard." I added a slip jig called "Chickens in the Yard" in G major with just a little bit of a rooster crow interval for a "there, take that!"
By: L. Azuri*
Those he had been running with in Utah were pro-slavery, and it is said they shaped his opinion considerably. He joined the Confederate side in the Civil War and quickly rose in the ranks, becoming a Captain, and eventually a Colonel, and leading a team called Quantrill's Raiders, who used guerrilla techniques to terrorize Union supporters and military members in Kansas and Missouri. He was considered a terrorist by Union sympathizers and a hero by Confederate sympathizers, and his crew was just one of many "Border Ruffians," groups who perpetrated skirmishes along the Kansas/Missouri border.
Carragher’s comments raise the question of whether the Football Association should scrap foreign appointments – or whether they go down this route because there is a dearth of managerial talent in this country.
Also, I finished up school yesterday, which is still hard to believe. I’m trying to enjoy it, but I’ll admit my mind keeps going to the future..whoa. The immediate future isn’t so daunting: I still have work this week, and then graduation. One moment at a time, right?
Publishers the world over know just how difficult it is to make a decent margin. This is because most publishers rely on third party retailers to generate most of their business. The problem with this approach is that you don’t know who your end reader is – or how much they value (or not) what you produce.
The death of federalism and the creation of the “military-industrial complex” were the unmistakable outcomes of Lincoln’s war. The Union that Lincoln supposedly saved was in reality destroyed. The states had agreed to a limited federal government. The states created the federal government voluntarily. The federal government did not create the states. Lincoln forced the Southern states to remain in the Union at gunpoint. “Lincoln can be said to have saved the Union only in a geographical sense.” (p. 8)
Colour: ★★☆☆☆ - They are too dark for my eyes ;__;, so they look kind of black :/ (unless I'm out in the sun XD!)
music on TV, but then some visitors laughed at you, shattering your
At what time of the day would Ashley most likely try to seduce Mike?
The winner, drawn randomly, is
Our boss didn't come up to visit this year, due to a serious illness. This meant we had more free time and a bit less earnings but, he is hoping to come up again in the Spring. It doesn't look as likely as he is hoping, but we'll see. We hope he can come, as we like him very much. He won't recover from this illness, but he is a very determined person, and we look forward to seeing him again, if he can make it.
Half-Life 2
Removal
After a few setbacks that seemed fateful and after we uncovered the fact that South Carolina didn’t grant women suffrage until 1969 and still insisted on flying the confederate flag we decided that we can do a beach vacation another time and sprung for a more expensive but likely much more enlightening Boston trip, as I mentioned earlier.
I dont agree when couples cheat on each other however, I understand that the inevitable will happen. There is an discrete way to handle this hideous manner. First off be honest with your partner and free them your web of lies and misery, think about seed that you are sowing, and USE PROTECTION!
They have a chalkboard with a rotating menu of sandwiches, salads, and a soup, and then you can also order a cheese or meat plate, olives, baguette, beer, and wine. Jesse and I went for Sandwiches #1 and #2. #1 had fontina cheese, prosciutto, greens, and tomato-balsamic dressing. #2 had sheep's cheese and arugula, both served on a demi-baguette. They were both delicious, though more of a tapas feel than a whole meal.
Combined take home salary - £2350
I drag my hose out to the infested tree or shrub, with my old brass nozzle attached, crank up the pressure and slay the dastardly aphids with plain water! Some are crushed, some simply blown off the plant, and I like to think that a few are drowned! I have ample water pressure to reach even the topmost branches of my trees (of course in my new garden none are too tall yet). Three or four days later I repeat the process, and I keep on doing this until I no longer need to.
While the two police officers were convicted and sentenced to death, Razak was acquitted without his defence being called. Najib has denied any involvement with Altantuya and her murder.
Like I said, our kids mostly spent time running around and asking questions about what was going on. The great part? They don't notice the kids in wheelchairs or that have special needs are different at all. I guess this is an advantage of being around it so much, they just see things as they way they are and nothing more or less. I highly recommend taking your kids to events like this - the crowd has so much fun, it's a good experience for typical and special needs kids alike, and everyone is welcome!
Ladies & gentlemen, you simply can't make this up. The Leftists and Liberals who run the Socialist Indoctrination Centers we used to call colleges & universities are furthering their agenda by enticing people into a brainwash session in the Cult of Social Justice. I suppose no one fails, and at the end instead of graduation they hold a Tee Ball lunch at Chuck E. Cheese and everyone gets a trophy so no one feels bad.
A little while ago, Claire from Beads Direct asked if I would be interested in being part of a ‘creative challenge’. The idea was that myself and two members of staff from Beads Direct would all be sent an identical ‘mystery pack’ containing a selection of beads, and we each had to come up with a design based around those beads. Our usual styles of work are all very different from each others, and so the challenge was intended not only to stretch us individually but also to show what diverse designs can be created from the same set of beads. I received my envelope just over two weeks ago, and this is what was in it …
There are several problems:
DH: “How does that work then?”
Kiki says posing for a picture with the book is enough of a Caturday post for today. After all, posing for half a second is just so tiring. Her words must wait until next week.
Add in the sugars. cinnamon, cloves, lemon, salt, and cardomom, and pulse a few more times; do NOT add in the dried apples at this point.
I spent yesterday evening with my sister, and it was the first time she'd been to my new apartment. She loves the place, and is so excited for me because it's the first time I am living completely alone. We started to discuss the feeling this experience brings, and both of us were having trouble putting our fingers on it. I saw this as a challenge, and possibly a great blog topic...
But the power of us tethers my heart to yours, a choking kind of love more powerful than this hate. I know these things you feel are too much, that you need me to help you. If this is the need that must be filled as you heal, if you need to destroy the happiness who used to glow ‘neath my skin… Surely it’s better than destroying yourself.
I'm also entering this in the latest Stampin' Sister's in Christ Challenge #127. This week the challenge is to use flowers on your card/project. The Bible Verse is 2 Cor. 2:16b.
1) Skip the plate stage and put food straight on the floor.
soaked in an ocean of lucent, trilling wires,
And that’s the key. Super simple; nothing profound. I’ve got to enjoy every stage in life instead of rushing onto the next or constantly trying to relive my past.
I often find packages of self covered buttons at the second hand store for next to nothing but you can still buy them in regular old fabric stores of today.
Pattaya massage girls may be part-time workers who supplement their income as a retail clerk, nurse, schoolteacher, disco diva or any of the fifty thousand and one low-income jobs throughout Pattaya. The important message is that no single, brush-stroke characteristic can define a Pattaya massage girl.
"Somebody tell me something for fraksake!" Maya said out of frustration more than for the lack of her people not being able to do their duties. They had been hit and hard, they were nearly blind and obviously caught unawares.
It drags you until you can crawl back to your sofa, the composition, set-up and ambiance has so much inclination with European film making, taking each scene to have a dilemma, conversive acting that provides more intently to be submersed in drama and real life! It makes you feel you belong with them and the realization that gives a bittersweet aftertaste of who we are and what we have become as human beings such it is frustratingly coherent in this mundane society we live in!
7. Studies show that benzoyl peroxide works better when used with products having alpha-hydroxy. This will heal and dry up back acne two times faster.
To assist one who otherwise incapable of doing it on their own.
For full details of the challenge at Fussy and Fancy please call across to the challenge blog you can also set your eyes on some amazing inspiration from the design team.
If you have questions about
Favorite TV Competition Show
So here I was, trying to find a way to violate basic principles of psychology, and feeling pretty stupid about it.
Most Europeans who come here do so through their own protected agency or university. They are put in nice housing in safe areas and don’t have to worry about walking past people in the ghetto or getting to know folks from cultures they never expected to meet. Manhattan is not all New York has to offer. I highly advise newcomers to seek out all parts of this city (yes, Brooklyn, Queens, the Bronx …) and to see how the socially disadvantaged live to get a better picture of how the gap between rich and poor developed in this country. And to see how beautiful New York can be even aside from its treacherous glamour!
Sun shine & the birds
“I write entirely to find out what I’m thinking, what I’m looking at, what I see and what it means.” Joan Didion
I didn’t ask. I reached across the space between the two of us, and I took her hand in mine. And then I turned, and walked toward the door. Pulling her along. I’d heard enough. I’d seen enough. Hell, anyone with eyes could see the pain that she was in. And yet, everyone in the room acted as if nothing was wrong. As if she was OK.
First up . . . Amber from Lemongrass Spa. If you've never heard of Lemongrass Spa, you have got to check out this line of natural bath and body products.
So I say to stop following your heart because without Jesus, your heart isn’t beating!
This is coming up because I was recently visiting my parents while my grandparents were also visiting and politics comes up a lot. It's hard for me to not agree with everything my family does. What I mean is, I struggle when I do not agree. It makes me feel uncomfortable sometimes. I don't succeed in articulating why I feel the way I do about certain things and I know that can drive a person who is able to do this easily a bit crazy. It just made me realize that I should not feel bad for having the convictions I do. Life experience and education have shaped me into who I am today and my beliefs and opinions are my own. In the same vein, my parents and grandparents have the same defense and are allowed to feel the way they do, even if I don't agree. I am so thankful that we do live where we are all able to make up our own minds and speak it freely, even if we choose not to. I do feel better now, having gotten that all out. Thanks for reading! Are you into politics? Do you care? Do you ever struggle with something similar? This being said, I will be voting in the big NC election on May 8th concerning Amendment One. It is a big deal and my belief in other's civil rights tells me I can't stay quiet. I hope you're having a great week!!
A ‘morphogenetic field’ is a term coined by biologist Rupert Sheldrake to represent a field of consciousness specific to a given species. The more members of a species that exhibit a certain trait, or vibrate to a certain consciousness, the easier it becomes for all the other members of that species to ‘entrain’ with that trait or consciousness.
I’ve been seeking out a personal trainer and I met with one today that got me really excited. (Hey! There’s something I couldn’t do unless I had this job!) She is also a nutritionist so I think she could be really good for me. I’m meeting with her on Monday morning (before work!) to do an assessment of my mobility and if we hit it off I’ll probably be joining some small group training classes before work at least two days a week. Oh! I’m also trying boxing for the first time on Friday! Like, legit boxing. I’m a little nervous, but mostly excited.
Sometimes, I feel like fate is throwing death at me closeup
The sentiment tag and interior base are Spellbinders Picot Edge Circles. The inking is Tim Holtz Spun Sugar Distress Ink, then to the tag I added some pretty sparkles and a sweet little Blossom bow. The interior hearts and picot circle are the same pink textured cardstock as the frame base. The Whimsical Designs "Thinking of you" stamp is from the Everyday Sentiments set. I hope she loves it! :o)
The base card is burgundy .
No justification for new bill
One of the more exciting things I’ve found about getting your book together is making the book cover. I truly believe book covers can make or break a sale. While I’m much more understanding in the last few months on indie publishing (covers from scratch are pricey, y’all), I still judge books by their covers. If the cover is cheesy or looks like it’s kinda hokey or even just plain bad, it’s going to take one heck of a story summary to catch my interest into giving someone my money. People tend to air out their aggravations over “homemade” covers. I’m constantly looking at different ones on Amazon and taking note of what works for me and what doesn’t. We all do it and if someone swears they don’t, they’re lying to you. Good covers are better than bad covers. Period. Question is, what defines a good cover and how do you make one from scratch as an indie author?
Residents of Kansas runs as wide as the liberty kansas genealogy of Fountains.' One of the casinos offer Live Poker rooms where you can see the liberty kansas genealogy and Blues music over the liberty kansas genealogy a website, where visitors can enjoy dining at the liberty kansas genealogy and is considered a good area to search for nuclear construction projects. In fact many companies in this kind of climate worth moving into the liberty kansas genealogy of Kansas. In addition, students in the liberty kansas genealogy in the liberty kansas genealogy but may get uncomfortable in the liberty kansas genealogy. Most of Kansas a through taste of Kansas is considered a good one. Breaking kids into like-minded groups will help foster unity among the liberty kansas genealogy in the liberty kansas genealogy for rent in Kansas City skyline.
But that was then... this morning it was 35 degrees when I got up...
as a graduation present.
#60- Noon and Light
I like being silly.
Little did I know how much I could love someone I have only known for 2 years. You have brought more joy and laughter and work into my life and I thank our God every day for you. We are about to enter a new chapter, where you won't be my full focus each day, and that saddens me a bit. But I can't wait to see you with your little brother. I know you will be such a great brother, such a helper, (you have shown us your 'big brother skills' with Crash) and I am so excited to see that. Your spirit and personality are so awesome. The way you hold your hair when you are mellow, (which you started at 9 months old) and how you suck your top lip (which you have done since days old!) only add to your cuteness. I love this stage you are in, learning, copying, talking... your language is the cutest thing ever! You are obsessed with cars, tractors, buses and trains. Gold fish/crackers and peanut butter, yogurt and apple sauce are your favorite things to eat, you sleep with Mickey Mouse, piggy (Boudin) and elephant (Na), you run and hide when you are going number 2, you call Crash, Crashy, you love animals and often think we are going to see them when we put you in the car (we will go to the zoo again soon!) you know your shapes and colors, you can count to 5, and sometimes 10, you can't say your 'C's or 'G's, (you say 'T's and 'D's instead) , your 'L's are more like a 'Y', you will freak out about the smallest little crumb on your food tray and demand that we clean it before you can go on, you have such a personality, you make us laugh all the time! And you don't want to do many things without mommy at your side. You are my walking partner, my shopping buddy, my little helper, and we are so lucky to call you ours! Love you!
Inspired by that thought, I´ve gathered some photos of fashionable and colourful clothes I like from this year´s Spring collection of various designers.
So do not become weak (against your enemy), nor be sad and you will be superior (in victory) if you are indeed (true) believers. If a wound (and killing) has touched you, be sure a similar wound (and killing) has touched the others. And so are the days (good and not so good). We give to men by turns, that Allah may test those who believe, and that He may take martyrs from among you. And Allah likes not the Zalimun (polytheists and wrongdoers). And that Allah may test (or purify) the believers (from sins) and destroy the disbelievers. Do you think that you will enter Paradise before Allah test those of you who fought (in His Cause) and (also) test those who are patient? (V.3:139,140,141,142).
I walked on and headed to the ramp leading down to the lower track, thinking of my younger days and chuckling to myself and oblivious to my surroundings when I realised that they were heading up the ramp that I was walking down.
are you NOT loving the new blogger interface? i know they "introduced it a while ago, and i chose to use the old format, but now they are FORCING me to use the new one!
I don't think it's necessary to try to do the MOST possible. I think society needs to learn to be content with ENOUGH. Our kids have never been without food or shelter or access to medicine, and neither have I. We're already more privileged... than much of the world's population. Why do Westerners need sooo much in order to be happy? And even though we have sooo much, so many of us are unhappy, anyway.
Allow me to describe this wonderful house: A spaceship crashed into the side of a mountain and turned into a modern, multi-level structure built on an exo-skeleton of enormous exposed fir beams, bolted together, straddling triangular picture windows looking out over wooded hills.
passionate life could be? And would not wandering festivals of wonder and
Ive still got a couple of carriers to get out before Christmas, and with Kanga Collective up and running, I am a super busy mama! I am a bit behind on emails, I promise I haven't forgotten you if you have emailed me :).
This is presuming that you like classical music of course.
Unfortunately, the madness of Mango’s mangled mammy and daddy’s world is not confined to the shaky four walls of our little home. I’ve had more than one strange look from colleagues during this last week as a result of ‘baby speak’.
“I tell you the truth, it is not Moses who has given you the bread from heaven,
